Too late - there is already a hexadecimal represetation of your instructions knocking around the web, causing quite a stir. Remember, it is the creative content, and not how it is represented or stored that counts.
Shit. Even an 89 should be able to figure that one out.
did anyone else get homosexual vibes while reading this?
I don't give this question because a guy that I am usually on the interview loop with does.  We try to coordinate so we don't ask the same thing.
Duh. Magnets ***cure*** cancer. They don't cure pacemakers, though...
Ooh. He said a rude word. Miss!
The fertility awareness methods is terribly flawed.  Women's cycles vary, sperm can live for up to 5 days now, and it's a difficult regimene to stick to.
Dude, chill.
I have problems with flicker on monitors and especially when I've worked in rooms lit with flickery tubes, but I'm fine with the new CFL bulbs - I've noticed a lot of difference between the premium brands and the cheapos though. I prefer them now to incandescents as you have more colour choice.
I started using CF bulbs over 2 years ago and I have never had to throw one away. I believe they are supposed to last 7 years. Not only that, you save about $50 bucks over the  life of the bulb. I wouldnt call that "crappy stop gap technology". As the technology gains popularity, you can bet that a way to recycle the bulbs will come along to address the mercury problem.
On the strings, pjdelport can argue with Sam512's contention in comment#1. As for patenting simple ideas, look up Tesla's patents for examples ... or any number of ridiculous patent attempts in the past 10 years on prior art in computing ... so obvious that a generation ago noone would bother. Put another way, copy protection has never worked, and the DMCA and copyrighting of codes notwithstanding, will never work. The winds will blow, regardless of laws and schemes to the contrary.
I certainly don't know the minds of the people who pushed for the war in Iraq but going to war for oil isn't a ridiculous reason. Our economy runs on it. It's not as serious as food but not far from. If the middle east stopped exporting oil energy prices would skyrocket. Trucking would become very expensive- then food would follow(most food is shipped by truck). There is no way we could ramp up enough nuclear plants(thanks to the foresight of the screeching environmentalists of the 70's) or implement wind/solar alternatives in time to save our economy. It's not a money issue it's a human suffering issue  many people could go hungry as the very least. Some projection I read said on average there's enough food in a major city for a week... that's it. Think Katrina was bad wait till NY runs out of food. Now this is close to a worst case scenario but keep it in mind. Most people don't realize how many failure points our modern civilization has. Sometimes blood for oil makes sense.
Don't forget, Pepsi sequesters tons of carbon dioxide every year in their bottles. Please don't burp after you drink it.
&gt; The accepted history Accepted by whom? And what are their agenda? If you read what the South Koreans had achieved in Hong Kong during the last round of the World Trade Organization talks, you would not be buying this peacenik propaganda. &gt; The conclusion I draw from the linked article is that the reason for the failure of the protests against the Iraq War is the lack of a coherent strategy or common goal, no strong and inspiring leadership.  Then you are a fool. You've bought into the Leader Principle, that movements need Fuhrers to lead them. This is of course *entirely* contradicted by the 1968 revolts in Paris which were wildly successful despite not having any kind of programme, strategy *or*  common goal. Let alone leadership. &gt; His "I have a dream" speech is still remembered today. And why do you think that is? Do you not find it the least little bit *odd* that the right-wing corporate propaganda machine dutifully repeats it? If I were to theorize a reason why, it would be in order to make his "dream" seem unattainable. Warning anyone else who "dreamed" that it is useless and they will only end up dead. A useful lesson that. &gt; The WTO protests got some press coverage because of all those anarchists tearing things up in Seattle, I'm glad you found your own reasons for the effectiveness of violence. &gt; but I think the message got lost. That people wanted to tear down the WTO? How did this message get lost?
whoops my bad.... yep it's 3,361.
new CFLs are NOT the same as flourescent tubes, but they aren't identical replacements to incandescents either.  One of the problems is that we've lived with incandescents for so long that we accept their flaws as lovable reality (a bit like the cracks and pops on a vinyl record, that vinyl junkies regard with fondness, not irritation).
not me.  i got downvoted into oblivion
Except you can't.
&gt; Ever notice how line-lengths in most books are no more then maybe sixty letters? There's a good reason for it. Yep, and that reason would be that pages and text are fixed sizes in the real world, so to do otherwise would involve changing the font size (*way* more important for readability) or the book size (cost/portability/storage concerns).  This is not true for the web. And it's *"than"*, damnit. &gt; There has been several studies, on the topic of on line line-lengths To my knowledge, there are none whatsoever that acknowledge the fact that text size, canvas size, monitor size and resolution are variable.  They all assume at least one is fixed, and rarely do they even bother stating what it is. Take the study he cites, for instance.  It specifies the optimal line-length for readability in *characters*.  Why?  Does it really make much difference to the human eye how many characters are in a line?  Or are other factors, like the actual physical width of the line on the monitor, more important?  There's no way of telling from the study because they don't vary the size of the font, which means that any attempt to optimise readability by measuring the number of characters in a line is practically cargo-cult behaviour.  You are probably paying attention to an artefact of poor methodology instead of the relevant factor. The study also says that full-screen line-lengths should be avoided.  Why?  That might be valid for 1024x768/17"/12pt Arial, but that's an invalid assumption for the web.  What happens when I've increased my font size?  Or what if I'm using a different size monitor?  According to this advice, if my monitor is 14" across, then 14" wide line lengths aren't very readable, but if my monitor is 20" across, then 14" wide line lengths are perfectly fine, despite the fact that the two instances might be *physically identical*.  Does that make sense to anybody? I've seen a *lot* of readability studies that seem to be direct translations from their print medium counterparts.  But this methodology *cripples* the results you get when you apply it to the web, because the same text (even with the same settings) can appear significantly differently to different users.  And the converse is also true: different text with different settings can appear identically to different users. Has anybody seen a decent readability survey that doesn't make this kind of assumption?  At the moment, I set a max-width in pt for media=screen and max-width in em for media=projection that are partly based on flawed studies and partly based on experience.  I'd like to do better. 
Depends on whether you see parents getting tax credit for dependents as them being "paid" to raise their children by "you"...
Lucky you--people pay big $$$ for that warm tube sound, and you got it for free with your place.
While I am glad that he feels good enough to work I am disappointed that he used this opportunity to lie and attempt to prop up this faltering presidency.
That's a shirt with the code *badly* photoshopped on it.
No.  It's an image of text that has already been rendered at the sub-pixel level.  You can save the image to your computer and open it up in MS Paint.  If you zoom in, you'll see the little red and blue pixels surrounding the text.  That's how the sub-pixel rendering works.  (there is also some anti-aliasing going on as well, if you look carefully).
タイトルが煽り過剰な気がする。「中学生レベルの学生が６０％を占める私立  大学も現れた」というのは、全入時代で国語に興味がない人間も大学に入るよ  うになったということでは？ それと、中学生レベルと言っても馬鹿にはできないでしょう。僕は、本を読ん  で分からない単語をメモるようにしているのだけど、一冊読んで全くメモらな  くて済むということはないです。メモを読み返すと中学生レベルと思われるものでは「言下」「先途」「生硬」  「四阿」「羊歯」なんて単語を調べている。意外と侮れない。記事の中で取り上げられている  「診談」「業会」というのも自分でもやってしまいそうな誤字だね。 まあ、僕が中学生レベルということかもしれないけど。
hey people i lov u
we use'm!
&gt; Someone's sex life should not be reason for a public whipping (unless they are blatantly hypocritical about it). Dude, we're talking about the *Bush administration*. 
That was your joke?  That a cavalry officer should be compared to an ice cream?   Ha.
Saying stupid shit should earn capital punishment. I'm tired of dealing with the same stupid lies over and over and over and over and over and over and OVER and OVER again.
what up i thank that we should talk some time
A tree falls on a car in a parking lot. The license plate says it all: WHY? 
It seems I don't express myself clearly enough. I specifically didn't offer my opinion on whether I consider it right or wrong, because that isn't the case I'm making.  &gt;*though reading between the lines, I think that your answer is yes, you think they are morally equivalent since, "the purpose becomes moot" and "they are the same act."*  I believe you missed my point. The time to state the moral case as to the use of animals is made when you decide initially whether it can be done at all. Once the decision is made to breed animals whose sole purpose is to be killed, all bets are off. What difference does it make to the animal  how it is used once you kill it? I wouldn't have thought this analysis is far from the common concensus on the use of animals.  Given the current understanding of animal conciousness I personally do find the 'mass production' and killing of sentient beings objectionable. Quite honestly its an interesting topic that I hadn't given much thought to before now. But it would seem logically, if you're going to breed billions of animals with the intent of killing them, whatever moral line there may be is crossed at that initial point.
Thanks for the laugh : )
Maybe, maybe not, but that's a separate issue. I'm saying that teachers' salaries probably *should* be higher than they are, period. (Public version: people should vote for bigger education budgets. Privatized version: people should demand higher quality education for their kids than they do.)
I totally agree.  The salaries often seem low, until you figure in the fact that most teachers only work 9 months or so a year.  If I could take 3/4 of my salary and only work 3/4 of the year, I'd take it in a heart beat.
Screaming in the face of danger can be helpful if that form of danger can be pursuaded to leave you alone like another person or animal.
60Hz is slightly noticeable to me.  70Hz is not. 
&gt;the reason you are getting constantly downmodded is that questioning the integrity and validity of a source is not an ad hominem attack. He didn't simply question validity and integrity of the source.  He stated: &gt;It's not about growing a pair, the mercury argument is a deliberate bit of right-wing misinformation. Cf.  Questioning the source would be something along the lines of "It's coming from fox news, a right wing news source.  Can we get confirmation from anyone else?" Instead, he simply called it bullshit simply because the link happened to be from foxnews.   A comparison could be made that if Fox news claimed the Earth rotated around the Sun, people would claim it's bullshit because it's Fox news is the source of the info.
I'm with you on the dimmer problem. I could use CFLs in my bathroom (no dimmer), but those lights are not ever kept on and I wouldn't earn back my money.
Sure, but he won't remember it by tomorrow.
You mean because his lips were moving? Yep.
favorite song evah...i sleep with my guitar...and cry myself to sleep...his name is Adam...
And claiming "it's misinformation because it's from fox" isn't a form of propaganda? Frankly, this is the first time I've seen a story about the mercury from a cfl causing problems.  Are we going to simply ignore every story if Fox happens to be reporting it?
It's not, it's what people are used to, and people hate change. The assumption that the colour of incandescents is somehow natural or superior riles me. It's a colour we've had no choice in, and are *used* to.  over a decade ago I replaced most of the bulbs in my living areas with artists daylight bulbs - cost a fortune (but money isn't that important - careful now you americans, don't go foaming at the mouth at that statement!) and it took a while to get used to the much cooler colour spectrum, but once I did I found that other peoples rooms started to look a kind of 'fake tan yellow' to me.
Hey, you been snooping around my house? No, my house doesn't have asbestos though.  It was built after 1970 or whenever people stopped using it.
Use Occam's Razor to determine the 'REAL' reason. The Neocons seriously believed they could topple Saddam, be greeted as liberators and create a secular, free-market Iraq that had good relations with Israel (in other words another Turkey). They were so blinded by their ideology that they never considered a plan B if/when their assumptions proved to be hopelessly wrong.
Except reddit is the same way and not nearly as bad.
What? [Walking on broken glass](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_wbRevNFcmg) lol. Actually I'm hoping people don't walk on broken glass laced with mercury. That's kind of my whole point. As for my "metaphor" tortured as it appears- I was actually referring to [the last position](http://reddit.com/info/1bmte/comments/c1bn1u) I took a lot of flack on from within Reddit.
Then you should disconnect from the internet and shut off your tv.  NO source is bias-free, especially news sources or Reddit.
That's exactly what's wrong with white males, they just put up with this kind of shit, whereas a black guy (or god forbid, a black woman) would be all over the fuckin news if he was denied a grant because of his colour. I don't understand why white men aren't outraged, your education, your funding, and your jobs are being taken away from you with affirmative action. Fucking stand up and say something! edit:  Please don't downmod this just because you don't like the statement, but do so on the statements own merit. Is it a fair thing to say or observe?
funny
Okay, I will never eat there, should I be in Toronto visiting my aunt. Leave the turban headed people alone! :(
I love the daytime bulbs too. They really make things like reading easier. But for newbies it is a bit of a shock.
That's not a question mark! That's a Cavuto!
See comment by CoachZed, this was a mass email.  Even if it wasn't a mass email, most congresspeople have software that automatically sends a pre-written reply determined by keywords in the email sent to them.
Well, given that fox frequently lies and obfuscates, that's not *that* surprising that many people discard them as a news source entirely. Fox has been proven to lie and twist the truth for poitical ends *so* frequently that it is fair enough to discard them as a news source.
nappy is an adjective describing small, tight curls and most often used to describe hair having those characteristics. While there is nothing offensive or demeaning in the word itself, its frequent use in a derogatory or racist manner has made it offensive to many people.
The Simpsons wasn't intended for children. &gt;_&gt;;
Where do you stop though?  Shouldn't Police Officers be paid more?  What about Firemen?  Paramedics?  What about government workers? The flat reality is that those jobs are supported by tax revenue.  Taxes are already very high.  If you want more money to go to those careers you should be lobbying to cut the fat out of government and redirect some of that money to the more deserving people. If paying teachers, police, etc. more involves raising taxes, most people will fight that tooth and nail. The jobs that do pay more are set by the market.  Even there people are constantly complaining that it's unfair how low salaries are. Something by Dad grilled into me as a child, "Life isn't fair".  I can't imagine most animals getting eaten by a carnivore would be thinking "well this is fair".
Absolutely.  Libertarians are not a huge part of the electorate, but I'd guess that those with "libertarian sympathies" are probably at least a double-digit percentage.  During the Bush years, the Republican party has wholeheartedly embraced fascist neocons and theocrats and has utterly betrayed their libertarian base.  I think this is part of the 2006 election loss. 
There might be truth to that, but it's not exactly among just conservatives. I'm assuming you're accusing me of being a conservative now.  I've been accused of being far right wing, far left wing, an extreme fundie, an atheist, and all kinds of things.
I'm not disagreeing that Fox is seriously biased, but I'd prefer to see a discussion of the story itself than just slamming it for the source. Maybe instead of merely slamming the story, the guy could have said Fox has it all wrong and linked to a more accurate story about it. 
You can take a look at Rydeheard and Burstall's [Computational Category Theory] (http://www.cs.man.ac.uk/~david/categories/book/book.pdf), which takes the idea about as far as you can with an HM-style type system. The trouble is that there are plenty of natural constructions (eg, slice categories) that don't encode terribly well.
I couldn't believe the NY Times called him "comic relief". I was watching clips of the debate in a food court and had to stop myself from standing up and applauding.
This is the last ditch attempts of a dying cause...The drug war is dead!
I'm not so much afraid of mercury as of having to come up with $2000 to deal with the broken bulb.   I use the damn things in order to SAVE money.
Don't miss next week's article: *How to get started with walking to locations in the vicinity*!
&gt;You are looking at it from the wrong end. That database contains full details for each car including unique values like VIN, it is in the output that we happen to only care about quantity and color. `select color, count(*) from inventory group by color` Aggregate operators are perfectly all right. [Good DBMSes](http://www.postgresql.org) let you define your own, for your own UDTs. &gt;This is what grownups call polite conversation and debate, not trolling. You're right. I apologize. I do wish you would ask questions that were not already answered in the literature, though.
If a complete MIDI file of a copyrighted song is a copyright violation (despite being just a plinky-plinky muzak rendition of the original) then a 0 byte file is a reasonable rendition of *4'33*.  It misses the point quite remarkably, but then so do most people who talk about the original...
There are dozens of airlines claiming to give discounted airfare tickets to customers when they use their website.  Many of these websites display the same prices; ones that differ are often only less expensive by a small percentage.
Could you recommend a bike brand too (For USA)?  (Thanks)
That explains so much about modern politics.
I wondered why there was no mention of Tanganyika and Zanzibar into Tanzania but this list starts at 1974, thus no mention of it or Persia.
Glad to hear you have good results. &gt;As the technology gains popularity, you can bet that a way to recycle the bulbs will come along to address the mercury problem. I hope so. Where I live - one of the bluest of blue states there is no recycling for anything. When it comes to market solutions to fix environmental problems, I have found that corporate interests tend to trump even obvious gains from a change of market structure. We can't even get the government to clean up jet fuel contamination of water wells in the area of government air force bases.  When I see a large scale roll out of mercury laden bulbs, and think of the number of broken bulbs I have seen in my life time, and then think of the permanent and devastating effects mercury has on water supplies, I am not very optimistic. Generally short term trade offs, which CFLs represent, marginally less power use now, vs getting rid of coal fire plants altogether or forcing them to run clean, I don't know that the short term payoff really solves the long term problem.
It's nice to see an interesting language which doesn't use bizarre syntax. It's just a shame things like this never take off.
The article makes a good point.  How does it matter how much THC is in today's pot?  Yeah, in the 60s you had to smoke 3 bowls to get high; today's consumers are more discriminating and would rather smoke only one for the same effect.  Stronger weed seems like more value for the consumer and thus a step forward, IMHO.
Mod parent up: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Normal_number
*Precisely*.  He's a Great Brain, but he's missed the point entirely on this one.
now we need a hot girl tatoo-ed this on her back.
Half of them are probably Clinton administration folks.  She opened her shop in DC in 1995.
Yes, and 130 die each year from lightening strikes. Should we hide indoors?
Brazil isn't using sexual repression as an excuse to bomb people.
The pictures makes me totally eager to go exploring some old quarries or abandoned mines.
http://www.simpsoncrazy.com/gallery/magazinecovers.shtml  It was on Cracked Magazine, MAD, Star wars Insider, Wizard, and had its own magazine marketed to 8-10 year old boys.  http://www.simpsonscollectors.com/releases.asp?cat=7 I'm not saying it's a bad show - I have my favorite episodes too -  but it is market toward kids.
Um ... I think that's a dude.
troll
What do you have against English? Reading comprehensions isn't what it used to be. EDIT&gt; Fuck. Apparently spelling isn't, either.
I've never been very eloquent, nor have I ever been any good at expressing my thoughts.  (And my thoughts were never worth much expressed, to say the least.)  But I'm going to do so anyway. In the first age, both "base" and "pedestal" software cost good money.  I mean *good* money, for the time.  Enough that the software companies slept well at night. "Base" refers to infrastructure software.  The software that functions as the foundation, the plumbing, and the gears and doohickeys that flip and spin behind the scenes.  Those early versions of Windows cost a good deal for their day, if you guys can recall. "Pedestal" refers to the "user" software; software that the user directly interfaced with to manage affairs, crunch numbers, to communicate and to be amused. It was all too new.  Most (in the computer user community) in those days never quite imagined that quality, free "base" software was possible.  So most happily paid through the nose for what they perceived was the quality standard. But that has changed. Programming is more accessible.  There are more tools.  There is more access to resources (the Internet is no small mention.) Yesterday's pedestal software moves towards "base" status as more is built upon it (if the software was any good), or other software copies and improves upon its operating model.  Yesterday's calculator and paltry word processor package that people happily paid a premium for is not today had for no less trouble than a Google search and click on the "download" button. As time moves on, and the innards of software become more accessible, this continuum will move ever onwards. In order for a programmer to remain profitable, he will have to ever associate himself with the demands of "pedestal" software, and what "base" software can be used to "build up" to the pedestal. Each day, all the software out there is ever shifting downwards on this graph; as mentioned before, today's "pedestal" software is tommorow's "base". So the programmer must stay ever current;  it is both his blessing and his curse.  He toils to stay abreast of how best he can serve his masters whims and wishes with the tools he has available. The man with the most tools and the knowledge of how to use them most efficiently will always have an advantage. So no, Open Source programmers are _not_ programming their way out of a job.  They are simply contributing more "base", upon which they will build the "pedestal" software that their users require. And the "pedestal" software is what brings the bread home.
Wow, those experiments are FUN!
I HAVE A BIG HEAD! AND LITTLE ARMS!
&gt; Accepted by whom? And what are their agenda?  Ummm... I wasn't talking about the WTO. I was talking about the Civil Rights movement. Two different issues addressed in two different ways. &gt; You've bought into the Leader Principle, that movements   &gt; need Fuhrers to lead them. Where did I say that strong leadership is a *necessary* requirement? It's just one tactic has worked for some movements. I also didn't say that decentralization *never* works. Another tactic. What I *did* say that is that *in this case* decentralization has not lead to effective results. Maybe they're just doing it wrong. Maybe effective leadership *might* help. Are you suggesting that effective leadership will *never* help? &gt; If I were to theorize a reason why, it would be in order   &gt; to make his "dream" seem unattainable.  Whatever floats your boat. But, there is more to this speech than just "I have a dream". Continuing: &gt; This is our hope. This is the faith with which I return to   &gt; the South. With this faith we will be able to hew out of   &gt; the mountain of despair a stone of hope. With this faith   &gt; we will be able to transform the jangling discords of our   &gt; nation into a beautiful symphony of brotherhood. With this   &gt; faith we will be able to work together, to pray together,   &gt; to struggle together, to go to jail together, to stand up   &gt; for freedom together, knowing that we will be free one   &gt; day. "Dream" has two meanings: a delusion and nothing more - you wake up and poof, or an ideal to strive for - a hope that things can be better and an inspiration towards action. I'll go with the second meaning. That's the basis for the American Dream (which I'm sure you probably think is BS), and it's also the basis on which I've tried to live my life. I'm not denying violence can work. But, so can non-violence. Both are tactics and both can be effective.
If something cannot be produced ethically at the current rates of production, then it should be done at lower rates. Chicken will become more expensive, people will eat less. Supply and demand
Spot on. But all one can do is try to explain to the people that their only chance for Gravel to win lies in their word-of-mouth, and that assuming he won't win only makes it all worse.
They're not usually sold immediately. Especially not if they're top-of-the-line superiority-preserving weapons. Here, have some superiority. Enjoy.
The most interesting part is the plan (and apparently existing work) on getting Ruby to run on the DLR.  Lots of people seem to be unhappy with the Ruby runtime.  If Microsoft nails the Ruby implementation, those people will have to decide between the purity of the Ruby community and the evils of Microsoft.  I anticipate the outcome.
Ive found:  1. Bring water. Duh. 2. get a bike that suits your needs:  Smooth, well-manicured roads? get a roadie.  Else? Get a mtb/hybrid. Your body will thank you. 3. bring a change of clothes. 4. buy CLIPLESS PEDALS! This is an oft-overlooked aspect. The energy transfer is so far superior to normal pedals you'll feel like superman once you're used to them 5. If you are a beginner, dont commute over 15-20 miles. You'll be unhappy otherwise. 6. Enjoy.
What is the verb "mod"?
Don't feel bad as there are plenty of terms and acronyms used in the electronics field that you won't find anywhere else, and the technical afficianados are the only ones who seem to be able to keep it all stratight, and sometimes it's a challenge for them as well.
maybe that's what you should have been saying instead of shouting 'ad hominem' over and over like it's a guaranteed argument winner :) For what it's worth, I absolutely agree with you here, now that you've stated a less reactionary position.
I wrote CNN, I told my friends, I posted on my blog, I signed the petition when I saw it go up on Gravel's site. Better than nothing.
The F15's pretty much undefeated. One of the arguments for the  F22's is keeping up with the Joneses. Which is kind of hard, if you're selling F22's to the Joneses. Hey, maybe the export version won't be as stealthy.
She's like something out of either Hermes' dream or nightmare, depending on whether or not he's working with her or working with her. 
Except this Leia is much cuter.
I get no longer life with a CFL than I do with regular bulbs, for some reason.  I'd love to know why, if anyone has an idea.  I use them in the kitchen where the light is usually on, and they only last about 2 to 3 months.
But these are not jobs that women enter. The work women do is not as well paid as the work men do. Even though it is vitally important as anything men do.  I am not disputing the point, I am suggesting that its the wrong question.
Besides, calling an escort service, or even hiring an escort, is not illegal. Vice would need to catch the couple in the act in order to prove that prostitution took place. That said, I can't wait to see who's next.
You had me at "ass of her skintight red jeans". 
I think I know my next tattoo! anyone got the T-Shirts up on cafepress yet? ....edited to show http://www.cafepress.com/rsrw how long before I get a take-down notice?
That's right.  We didn't have to try to link 'em - everybody knows Saddam personally flew one of them big ol' planes into one of them Empire State Buildings.
And some people wonder why there aren't more women in IT...
lol.  Thanks, and I take your point.  However, I do have to mention that I only pointed out that it was an ad hominem attack once.  The link I provided was in response to the person saying "huh?".  I assumed he didn't know what the fallacy is.
Culpawhosawhatsity?
&gt; what functional language supports backtracking? The ones with backtracking monads?
Yeah... labcoat-wearing, *freakishly intelligent* tight-asses.
F-22's can't be launched from carriers anyway.
No. Just... No.
6a 75 73 74 20 64 6f 77 6e 6c 6f 61 64 20 69 74 20 77 69 74 68 20 42 69 74 74 6f 72 72 65 6e 74
Some of us are.  Outraged, I mean.
Right, some magical coating that doesn't transfer heat.  At all.  Unless they put NASA-style insulation on it, I'm skeptical.
If Muslims submit to the jurisdiction of such courts voluntarily, I don't see the big problem  Orthodox Jewish diamond merchants have long had their own private religious court system.  Much of American justice is now privatized, through Arbitration clauses, many of them far from voluntary.  That said, the issue is HOW voluntary is submission to these courts? What would happen to a Muslim woman who took her husband to a civil court? Given what we know about Muslim treatment of women, I don't think it could be considered racist to suggest that she may be in danger of physical, even lethal violence. 
for your edification: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aspd
http://img.photobucket.com/albums/v391/DigitalDuality/103642.jpg
Well I didn't want 'em anyway so THERE!
I imagine that the "j", "e", and "w" keys on David Duke's keyboard are well worn. Heck, if he is a touch-typist, the fingers that correspond with those keys are probably shorter.
Don't worry I see people on the internet that make me embarrassed to be an American all the time.
That's been done already: http://yro.slashdot.org/article.pl?sid=07/04/14/1237246. Go and laugh.
This is why we gotta invade Indonesia.
Published by the FDA: fda.gov
This has been dumbed down in a bad way: 1. The pseudo-explanations of how base notation (hex and octal) works ("This is only for the purpose of the initial evaluation, Javascript converts octal and hexadecimal numbers into base ten decimal as the script is evaluated.") -- sorta correct in spirit, but no, all the numbers are internally represented as floating-point *binary*.  2. The whole section on bitwise operators tries to explain some of the effects of two's-complement math without actually explaining two's-complement math, and tries to explain that ~0 == -1 by claiming that 0 uses only one bit, so it becomes 1, but there's also a sign bit, so it becomes -1, which is flat-out wrong.  (All bitwise operators operate on full 32-bit two's-complement integers in Javascript.)  3. It's missing at least a few of the standard, browser-implemented numeric functions, such as ToInteger() and ToInt32(). The listings of browser versions for different constructs could theoretically be useful, but I notice the most recent versions listed are FireFox 1.5 and IE 5.5, and most of them are in the Netscape 2.0/IE 3.0 range. The [ECMAScript spec](http://www.ecma-international.org/publications/files/ECMA-ST/Ecma-262.pdf) is one of the clearest, most easily-readable language specs I've encountered, and explains all of this stuff much more precisely.
&gt; I wasn't talking about the WTO. I was talking about the Civil Rights movement. And where did you get the idea I was talking about the WTO? Granted, my segue was a bit on the invisible side. &gt; a hope that things can be better and an inspiration towards action. I'll go with the second meaning. That's the basis for the American Dream (which I'm sure you probably think is BS),  You mean, winning the lottery by being charming? I'll say that's BS! So is living your life on the basis of vague hopes instead of understanding and reason. &gt; Are you suggesting that effective leadership will never help? Look at the past and realize that leadership is a liability. The communists, who always try to install themselves in positions of leadership because they are authoritarians, have routinely shut down protest movements that threatened to turn into revolution. Especially anti-authoritarian revolution. Look at the union leaders in Nigeria who in the 90s ran a strike that ended with *higher* gasoline prices than it began. They were bought off. Look at all bureaucratic unions. There isn't a leader out there that's worth the 7 cents of phosphor and other minerals you would get by grinding his body into fertilizer.
&gt; If I just drink enough beer, women will love me, right? No no no.  The idea is you get THEM to drink the beer, and they'll love you!
...and lost me at "we gotta be ready to fight and not be these passive little lukewarm, namby-pamby, kum-ba-yah, thumb-sucking babies that call themselves Christians. Jesus? He got mad!"
Wow, you're getting a lot of crap and pseudoscience thrown at you.  It's interesting because I've actually looked into the claims you've made and have found them to be accurate. Before anyone asks - no, I can't be arsed to hand them to you.  If you really care about it, do your own damn research.  I don't care enough about convincing you to look it up.
I'm conflicted on this. On the one hand, 3 guys beating him up with clubs, and smashing his computer and entertainment system is horrible, and I hope those guys who did it get caught and have to pay for everything, as well as jail. On the other hand, repeatedly ganking someone over and over is a really repulsive thing to do.  It's legal in WoW, but seriously still a shitty thing to do. It would have been far better if 4 boys from a small mountain town got themselves up in really high levels and ganked him back for a few months.
So why don't you? I would suggest that its because it would be 3/4 of much less than you make now.  I also know teachers. Yes they work nine months of the year but then they also have to pay for school supplies for their students out of their salaries. I worked in a bookstore and teachers were always trailing in buying supplies with their own money. One of them set up a store in her living room just to cater to other teachers.  The fact is that supply and demand does not work for teachers. And it doesn't work in education. This may be because it defines social class. It is one of the last ways that the class system can be maintained.  The good teachers are paid the same as the bad. Which is ironic. Because commitment and compassion in teachers produces an educated capable work force that does not need to do the things that require lawyers.  Paying teachers more makes sense. But it doesn't happen because compassion in work depresses salary.   
Oh all us atheists should be scared.  Kirk Cameron from growing pains and the guy who believes a banana is the ultimate argument for god.  I wonder what he is going to pull out of his ass this time?
&gt; And it is worth wondering what might have been had Boris Yeltsin, in those critical years, turned Russia along a different course. The assumption is evidently that the former Soviet Union, or at least Russia, was ready, willing, and able to be more or less instantaneously converted into some sort of capitalist democracy if only Yeltsin had encouraged more group participation(?)  This seems to me to be a bit like saying that a leaky wooden-hulled boat with dry rot and damaged masts could have been sailed safely around the world if only the captain had asked the crew to suggest an alternative course. Yeltsin was in the cauldron and so unilaterally acted.  Was he perfect?  Goodness, no.  But he did the best he could under extremely difficult circumstances.   If we're going to play the game of "wondering what might have been", let's try this: Yeltsin was occasionally seen drunk while in office, but having worked his way to the top of a totalitarian political system he tried (albeit, perhaps unsuccessfully) to make that system more democratic; George W. Bush was conspicuously sober, but having been handed the keys to a democratic political system he tried (alas, too successfully) to make that system more totalitarian.   What might have been, indeed...
Sadly it seems to only be the Daily Show that does that.
I started to understand the POV better after I saw selections from Brzezinski's book "The Grand Chessboard" and how he viewed the world. Then Afghanistan and Unocal made more sense. It was interesting hearing Dubya say we were "addicted to oil" considering how consistently the US Gov has worked to ensure that we've had no alternative. The 1973 shortage did nothing to change this. It's like they're blind to every option except oil ... an idee fixe. For sure it's not about the practical concerns most of us share.
Steel is not steel. There are several THOUSAND differing alloys of steel, not to mention the manufacturing processes used to create them changing their properties (e.g. maximum stress)
Whats with the title? I read the article, 9/11 wasn't mentioned at all. No quotes from "nut-jobs" or anything of the sort. Why do you feel it necessary to politicize this story?
I'm not sure that just pledging to pinch pennies for a month merits the use of the phrase "hardcore badass."
ah, sorry, my bad then.
I think you think I'm arguing with you. I'm not trying to say your unqualified, in fact, your probably tons more qualified to discuss this subject than I am. But my point still stands, the *majority* of people refuse to look at the facts. I'm not saying that YOU do, just people in general. I respect any opinion that's backed up by facts, even if it's not my own.
He makes a corruption crackdown the focus of his administration, yet he is one of the most corrupt officials in the history of an already corrupt organization.  So of course Bush gives him his full approval.
This smear and denegration of Carter brought to you buy http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/FrontPage_Magazine a house organ for http://www.aipac.org/   
Just sayin' it' an option, and it's worked for me/us (so far) when that's the method we're using. I'm too busy for sex anyway :/
Son got elected twice ...
I'm pretty sure it doesn't merit the phrase "hardcore badass"
Even incandescent bulbs should last way longer than that, my guess is you have some pretty significant voltage fluctuations in the fixture or line. My front light is like that and its a bitch to fix because its outside and up high, I found special "cottage bulbs" that resist voltage fluctuations (incandescent) and so far so good.
stupid. funny to all you geeks maybe. go ahead down this msg.
&gt; Exactly why is the question in the title even posed? Are we all supposed to immediately switch to CFL, or is there some sort of global CFL movement that the "American public" is not following? Why don't you read the article and find out? &gt; The current market share of CFL bulbs in the United States is about 6 percent, up from less than 1 percent before 2001. But that compares dismally with CFL adoption rates in other wealthy countries such as Japan (80 percent), Germany (50 percent) and the United Kingdom (20 percent). Australia has announced a phaseout of incandescent bulbs by 2009, and the Canadian province of Ontario decided last week to ban them by 2012. 
Well.... speak up a bit... the world can't hear you.
What about the story isn't true?
I'm in the Northeast and I'm curious to hear which school it was.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/KSR_v._Teleflex http://www.supremecourtus.gov/opinions/06pdf/04-1350.pdf
I was unclear, and for that I appologize. It isn't your use of the terms I am questioning, but rather the terms themselves as defined by Codd and his contemporaries. I feel that in by defining relational databases to be restricted to only sets, as opposed to both sets and ordered lists, he made a mistake. 
Just rebrand the GOP as the "Moderation Party" and the Dems as the "Toleration Party." That'll fix everything!    
I think that most government safety regulations are unnecessary, wasteful, and maybe even result in making us less safe. This rather counter-intuitive view is based on the idea that freedom and responsibility are complementary. With freedom comes responsibility and conversely, responsibility requires freedom. Here are two examples in different fields. In the airline security field, it is rather regularly reported on reddit that attempts to bring weapons and explosives through government security and onto commercial airplanes are successful. There was even a report that airlines cannot even guarantee that the security personal will checking baggages will not steal from passengers' baggages.  Regarding food safety, again on reddit or some other site, I read recently of a restaurant in New York City which had just passed it's government food safety inspection despite being overrun with rats (caught on video several hours or days later.) In both of these situations, government employees were paid to keep the public safe, yet when probed, government provided safety proved illusory. Government regulations and inspections are simply not as effective and as efficient as personal initiative, creativity, and responsibility.  Interestingly, I've read somewhere that airlines actually want the government to be in charge of security. Not because they think government can do a better job, but because if government is responsible for security, the airlines are not- the airlines would prefer not to have the liability. I think this reasoning is why industries don't object more to government regulation. Regulation absolves them from responsibility. An interesting article about how more reliance on personal responsibility rather than regulation can make even traffic more efficient is http://37signals.com/svn/archives2/less_signs_less_accidents.php  which I think I first saw on reddit. Regarding your example of food regulation as an essential function of government, I think that an effective marketplace (which allows consumers to choose quality food providers) together with an effective judicial system (which allows injured parties to recover actual and punitive damages from those responsible in the chain of commerce) are a much better protectors of the public's food than government inspections. Government regulations are actually counter-productive to the extent that they contribute to a less effective marketplace by create a barrier of entry to new food providers, and to the extent that they remove responsibility from those in the chain of commerce and place it on less accountable government employees.
Thanks M15.
&gt; I don't understand why white men aren't outraged, your education, your funding, and your jobs are being taken away from you with affirmative action. Fucking stand up and say something! We can't; NASCAR is on right now. Actually, it's an interesting question.  I don't think I know anyone who thinks they've been short-changed or passed over because of one or another affirmative action scheme. But I expect there are  those who do feel this way.  Are they just such a minority (ha ha) that their anger is, in the scope of things, invisible and/or irrelevant?  Do they simple not have the wherewithal to raise a ruckus?    One problem may be that when such issues get raised, a David Duke figure arises to "lead" them.  For whatever reasons, the media is less tolerant of white versions of Al Sharpton.
Yeah, I'll make sure to do that.
downvoted because similar articles were already submitted.  you could have at least linked to an insightful blog post or something.
How about killing me softly, with his song?
...and yet appears to be less well regarded than his father.
Riding on the road can be dangerous at times.  I would use the bike lane if there was one...
When Consumer Reports does a study on this, I'll listen.
Not so sure of that.  What law would you be violating by *posting* such information?   I can see *using* the information in order to falsely obtains goods or services...but the mere posting: unlikely.  
&gt;He is the only politician I've ever seen, who both understands why the US acts like it does, and tells the American people about it. &gt;Watching him speak proves the other presidential candidates are just playing an elaborate game -- dodging the actual issues and saying whichever half-truths their focus groups say will appeal to the widest number of people. Wait until you see Ron Paul in the Republican debate.
He did sort of ask for it, "he had made the mistake of telling her where he lived and “if her husband was man enough to just come meet me to settle this.” But three men with clubs is a bit overkill.
All the low paid jobs you mention require a measure of compassion. They are low paid. I am not sure what the conection is but it seems to be there. Other areas: Clerics, Drug rehabilitation, nurses: none are as well paid as carpenters and plumbers.  Another point: People love to talk up education. The fact is that as a political issue, in any national election it rarely gets into top five. I think people resent education but they don't know what to do about it. So they do the next best thing: they underfund it. Education is a mess. We are a culture that works because it is educated. Yet there is no national discussion of what education means. It comes down to getting something we call knowlege into little heads. This is assessed with ordinal grades. The principle matrix of our society incorporating everything from social values to ability to make money can be assessed by a single ordinal symbol. And that symbol represents the success or failure of the system.  A place to start: Abolish Adolescence and develope a culture of life long learning. Teach civics. Start with Socrates and the Bible
ignorance is bliss
http://youtube.com/watch?v=tramh0n4o9U
http://www.myspace.com/09f911029d74e35bd
Become patriarch of his clan.
I doubt I'm the only person asking him about impeachment. How about a prepared statement on why he doesn't support it?
I didn't sign up as a subscriber. Either this is a reply or it's spam. Either way, it sucks.
I wonder if there is a much higher rate of cancer amongst Muslim women that use a hijab and wear long sleaves and such.  Or perhaps they know they don't get much sun and so take vitamin D already.
I don't think they were counting pr0n sites.
Wow your wife sounds like a real catch, making dumb arguments to thwart the compassionate.  As if those who care for other beings don't have enough obstacles already.
True, but they still exist in medicine cabnits everywhere.
"Meanwhile, the same old disclosures of the Bush family's extensive financial connections to Arab oil money, particularly from Saudi Arabia, ain't done shit to my belief in their integrity." ps: bad link, looks like.  i got no article.
Sex for fun? Hey, maybe I should try that.
&gt; Number 69. Pick your favourite bits from this article and read out some of the suggestions to your partner. Ask him what he thinks - it's a subtle but effective way to kick-start frank discussion about your fantasies. This hardly qualifies as an "incredible sex trick for women".  I feel cheated!
so how legal is this? http://www.cafepress.com/rsrw
Youa Culpa.
She was definitely my favorite.
&gt; For abdominal surgeries, going through the mouth, vagina or rectum would avoid the need to cut through sensitive tissues I'd hate to hear what they consider "sensitive tissues"!
Illegalization creates an extra incentive to cram as much potency into as little weight as possible, as penalties are based on the weight of the amount you get caught with.  It makes no difference to those who actually smoke marijuana, since they just have to smoke less weed in order to get the same effect. Actually, it's better for consumers, because they're getting more of the active ingredient and less of the smoke from plant material.
&gt; # MAKE MASTER REVOKE SESSION WITH KILL  [It's hard to cram so much violence into one SQL statement. But they did it.](http://code.google.com/p/google-mysql-tools/wiki/FastMasterPromotion)
1) Different conditions 2) Different grade of fuel 3) Different steel alloy 4) No thermal insulation 5) unknown condition of bridge after impact 6) Different construction method So in conclusion, none of the boundary conditions for making a comparison between the two are valid.
Does "java developer's perspective" == "somebody who would be scared of closures and iterators?" Because those things are tucked away at the end. He doesn't even hint that anonymous methods are anything but a convenient way to define delegates. They're definitely much more than that. If I were writing this I would put those things up at the top and say: "Here are some features that may obviate the need for some of the idioms you are used to in Java." Instead it's just a comparison of keywords. Thanks anyway, I suppose.
Is using a loop ever a good idea? I hope I am asked that in my next job interview.
&gt; You mean, winning the lottery by being charming? Well, no... Let's say that your goal is to be wealthy. You can pin your hopes on the lottery, but that is a fool's hope. Precisely because it is not based on understanding and reason. The other thing you can do is look at what it takes to build wealth. Learn how to advance in your career, learn how to wisely invest your money, etc. Come up with a plan and goals and hope that it all works out. It might not. After all, we all have to deal with the vagaries of chance. But, even if things are looking bleak, don't just give up. Keep on hoping. Keep on dreaming. Learn from your mistakes and setbacks and keep on going. Hopes and dreams can be motivation. This is not "vaguely" hoping. You may probably still think this is BS. But, I have found  that for me, even when things are at their absolute worst, this attitude has kept me happy and motivated. Some have called me a naive optimist. I wholeheartedly accept that label. But whatever floats your boat! &gt; Look at the past and realize that leadership is a   &gt; liability.  I'm going to stick with the middle road and say it *can* be a liability. I don't look at the world as black and white.
after the imus debacle we won't be watching msnbc.
nah. I'm going to have to go with dogger here. Take a look at [this video](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=knEIM16NuPg).  Is it to make women feel good about themselves? Or great marketing... 
From the quoted editorial:  &gt;Forgive me a Dave Barry moment, but I AM NOT MAKING THIS UP. Doesn't this sound like something out of an Orwell novel? War is peace. Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength. Security is freedom.  It's like something you'd expect to read on The Onion. Is this *really* coming out of the mouths of Neocons these days?
I'm just curious..  If you take a look at his [statistics page](http://maddox.xmission.com/statistics/statistics.html), reddit.com isn't on there even though this is currently at #1. Is there something reddit does in the link that hides where the clicks are coming from?
You have to see the interview he did on 60 minutes, it's fascinating.  He's obviously a very passionate guy and he makes some good points, but he always seems to fall short of accepting much blame.   Watch the 60 minutes interview with George Tenet for yourself. http://www.torrentreactor.net/view.php?id=938471
Certainly by me. Worst president ever. But Bush 1 (who accurately called Reagan on "voodoo economics") seemed rankled by his re-election failure.
As I understand the rationale behind Codd's choice of sets as the underlying structure to his relational theory (true, as glossed by Date, at least in the Seventh Edition of his eponymous opus; a paragon of clear exposition if I am permitted the remark. I personally find Codd's writing opaque.), the idea is that relations model predicates *extensionally*(i.e., by comprehension of its values) rather than symbolically by some formula. By the closed-world assumption, two equal-valued (repeated) tuples in a relation cannot be distinguished by fiat, as there isn't any accessible "outside" to which to appeal for arbitration, and hence are to be considered *identical* (i.e., the very same tuple); so the choice of sets as representation of relations is logically forced. So, you can view the fact that relations are (represented by underlying) sets as a *consequence* of the closed-world assumption. It is, I think, very difficult to espouse an alternative representation without justifying breaking the CWA. *Edit:* corrected mix-up of extension vs. intension.
maybe they should just have unattractive women that aren't selling anything at all. That would be a good use of marketing money.
いったい何をしてたらそこまで日本語が分からなくなるのか。どんな入学試験をやっているんだろうか。
or here.... http://www.cafepress.com/rsrw
agreed, steel is not just steel. the only thing all steel has in common is Fe (iron) as a base, and at least a 0.05% Carbon content - which can go all the way up to about 2% without becoming brittle. We wont even go into the myriad alloying elements that are added to drastically modify the performance properties.  Go get a material science text book, it's fascinating and you won't sound dumb when talking about stuff like this.
http://www.cafepress.com/rsrw
The YF-23 was the failed competitor to the YF-22, so I doubt the next fighter will carry the F-23 designation.
本当に実践している人がいるから困る。
Its a mistake to be attacking Tenet now.  His defense that it wasn't his job to publicly contradict the admin at the time is valid.  The big story here is how much the neocons had predetermined an attack on Iraq
It is tricky to always remember to unclick the automatic upvote for my own item reddit applies. How about reddit turns this silly feature off and let patting your own back be a choice? (No, I didn't upvote this post, or anything else of mine from the last few months)
wow, how cool
Mercury evaporates at room temperature. So yeah, stick a fan in the window, maybe a space heater in the room, and it won't be in your rug for long.
Judging from his method, I'd say he was a pyro who got into firefighting as a healthy outlet for his desires.
Natural gas is better than coal because it has a higher hydrogen to carbon ratio than oil and coal. That means it produces less CO2 per energy. Funny related post by Deltoid: http://scienceblogs.com/deltoid/2007/04/pinata_whacking_not_outsourced.php 
A basic principle of QED is that the photon probability follows the classical optical intensity in these experiments. In principle, one would need to reduce the intensity of the laser to allow single photon events to be captured by a suitable sensor, but you would simply reproduce these patterns.
A. They assert that higher muscle mass does not increase one's BMI, which is patently false. I am too well built to ever be considered of normal weight for my height. Fat, I am not. B. They assert that this is due to a 'better body image' than heterosexual women. Better? If they are fat, does that not suggest that their body image is out of line with reality? A better phrase would be 'more positive body image'.  Unless they've been seriously misquoted by the reporter, this whole study seems bolixed by the preformed opinions of the investigators.
Does MIDI have a code for "piano on" and "piano off"? I think that might be a decent encoding of _4'33"_…
The license appears to be GPL-incompatible, but grants use of any patents covering the software.
What's next? Super Aids?
It weakened patents in the sense that there will be fewer patents, because more can be rejected for being too obvious.
&gt;So how does a hexadecimal string contain ANY information how to circumvent copyright protection? here's a very simple example: when you do a simple rotation cipher, e.g. add x to any letter of the alphabet, you choose an x. if x=1, then your cipher rule is A-&gt;B, B-&gt;C, etc. if someone trying to decrypt something you've encrypted knows what x is, they can decipher any encrypted string instantly. if they don't, they might have to poke around a bit among the 26 potential values for x to find the one that decrypts properly. think of an encryption key as just a much, much, much more complex value of x corresponding to a much more complex cipher involving prime numbers and factoring and all kinds of stuff that we proles don't understand. the upshot is that without the number, it's prohibitively difficult to work backwards and derive the unencrypted content; with the number, it's trivially easy.
More importantly, the Euro keeps rising. Eight week vacations, free college, free health care, no wars, on their way to solving their energy problems. *Their* future's looking good. Like the knight said at the end of "Last Crusade", *they* chose *wisely*. Our gross debt, on the other hand, is $50 trillion (counting entitlements, GAO, 2006), we're in a housing slump, widely reviled, a house divided, corrupt to the hilt, and mired in war. I wonder why the dollar's not dropping faster.
welcome to the wide wonderful world of the DMCA. it's illegal to hand someone the key, tell them where the door is, or even mention that the door exists. happy birthday!
Better yet find a bike that fits your body and your needs! A good bike fit will make your riding much more comfortable and pleasant.
I posted the Reuters story when it first came out, over here:   http://reddit.com/info/1kx59/comments
I'm going to ask you a serious question: do you know what you type when you type it? Didn't you proofread what you wrote earlier?  You actually tried to argue that the problem with sexist young men isn't the fact that they're sexist, but because they're disillusioned.  &lt;sarcasm&gt;Oh no, it's not the misogynist asshole's rantings on the internet and the way he treats every single one of his girlfriends and gal friends in his life, it's not his fault, it was the emotional death he suffered as he went through college and didn't get all the pussy he deserved.&lt;/sarcasm&gt; And then you blame my tenacity on my youth.  The old, "you'll see thins my way when you grow up, I'm the adult, you're the child, so shut up."  Yeah, that's just more conversational bullying and you, otterplay, are a bully.
that's not a digital protection mechanism. you need to get one of those nifty electronic locks before you can sue people. get with the times.
I like this article!:)
No arguments about the dimmer issue, which is why I've got a few fixtures in my house still using incandescents. Some notes about the warm up time - my understanding is that back in the bad old days the warm up period actually referred to the time it took the ballast to warm up to the correct operating temperature, and that the bulb did not produce light until this temperature was hit. These days, in my experience, it refers to the period between when you turn the switch on and when the bulb reaches full brightness. Once I got used to the fact that hitting the switch doesn't result in instant full brightness I actually started to enjoy it. It allows my eyes a bit more time to adjust to the change in light levels.
unfortunately, the DMCA isn't concerned with copyrights -- it only cares about circumvention mechanisms. it's technically illegal to circumvent the EULA on your own copy of a piece of software.
There go my fantasies. :-(
Yeah, who needs news stories? We've got blogs, with millions of nobodies offering their opinions on said news stories!
That's great. Very encouraging. :-)
That is where I am. I buy only the best herb that I can, and it runs pricey. I typically pay 60 for 1/8th, but that lasts me about 2-3 weeks.  Just buy the good shit, it limits the bad feelings, and lasts long. Also, you don't have to carry much on you, so if you run into the 5-0, no huge deal.
What does Gravel think about the second amendment?
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/09_F9_11_02_9D_74_E3_5B_D8_41_56_C5_63_56_88_C0
Of all the myths I'd love to destroy it'd be the one that bicyclists don't pay their fair share of the road maintenance and construction. It makes a few assumptions that aren't valid: 1. Bicyclists don't also own cars, who pay licensing and tab fees, which pay for roads.  2. Gas tax pays a big percentage of the road cost, and also see back to point 1--bicyclists nearly all of the time also own cars.  3. All bicyclists are unsafe road users  4. Bicyclists running red lights cause many many accidents and is utterly unsafe.
It is, more or less, a password to unlock HD DVDs. The password is a prime number, which might sometimes just arise if you're, say, generating a bunch of prime numbers. However, the law says that if you put the number out there with the intention of abetting the circumvention of digital rights management encryption, then you're guilty of violating the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA). Just stating the number with the wrong intentions is a crime, as is knowingly linking to a website that has the number in order to help spread the information. Copyright holders can send a notice to your ISP/webhost/etc if they notice you sharing the key and then your service provider has to pull down your page within a certain amount of time.
True that. They will tell you that you need $2000 of clean up just so they can cover their asses.
The decision was unanimous, too. That's always good.
It's not obligatory to use the bike lane (in my state). And, if you were an experienced bicyclist you would realize that the bike lane is often unsafe to use because it is in the 'door zone', meaning cars open their doors and block the lane, forcing the bicyclist to suddenly merge with traffic, or brake in time if possible. Further, they're often filled with broken glass and debris, which can easily cause flats.
I've read that women may see color better than men do.  Maybe CF bulbs really bug them.
More fun to make new porn
Looks like a fun little spam site, but at least it's a halfway decent article to try and win some SE love.
I'm not an expert on this subject. I look forward to being corrected where I'm misinformed, although I'm surprised by your harshness.  You're correct. Fuel-based fertilizers and GMO crops are glorious inventions that have saved billions of lives. Without these technologies, farm yields couldn't sustain the current population of the earth. I think the guy who invented GMO corn won a Nobel Prize, and it was well-deserved. However, these advances have come at a cost. About 20% of US petroleum usage is expended in fertilizing, transporting, processing, and otherwise making food. That comprises about 4.2 million barrels per day. This doesn't negate the boon of cheap food that fuel-based fertilizers have conferred on starving populations, but most people in the US -- especially the reddit demographic -- can afford to spend more on food. They might choose to do so, like I did when I learned about some of the hidden mechanisms of industrial food production.  I buy organic primarily out of environmental and economic concerns, and only secondarily for the putative health benefits. My previous post meant to illustrate the challenges that make it so difficult to apply good science to food. This shouldn't be taken as a priori evidence that organics are healthy. It merely suggests that our current understanding of food safety is inherently less certain than many other realms of scientific understanding. The US is unwittingly participating in a decades-long experiment to determine whether the USDA and FDA can effectively officiate food safety, and we are fatter and sicker for their efforts. Based on this track record, I will refrain from snorting large quantities of DDT, even if the FDA insists that it's safe. I agree with you on most points. Organic food, like most movements, is populated primarily by uninformed zealots on both sides. But despite being soaked in hype, "organic" is the only food movement with sufficient consumer awareness to drive changes in the food industry. "Organic" is just a useful catch-word for getting the attention of those who are tired of eating shitty food. Here's a good article. http://tinyurl.com/2o6lf8   
That will teach you mess with another countries constitution.  Wouldn't it be great if the rest of the world could put a "no military agression" policy in the US constitution.  Imagine how easy it would have been to stop the Iraq invasion!
You make a very good point, however, I do not think it necessarily translates. I believe weather is more of a thermodynamic problem than a statistical problem when it comes to this particular issue. Yes I know there is such a thing as statistical thermo, but that deals with the actual atoms, which reminds me I have to do that homework. Off topic, how do you get the bar in front of a quote?
Good for ABC. The list is of a bunch of phone numbers who may have used an alleged prostitution ring. It's not exactly damning evidence but would be damaging in the court of public opinion. Let the courts duke it out, that's how it works in the US. Remember how sleezy it felt when Jason Fortuny (and then Michael Crook) posted info about some people who responded to a Craigslist ad? This would be no different except that it's from a major news organization. Or think of it this way, out of a list that large there *are* going to be mistakes. How would you feel if you were one of the mistakes?
And Sarah McLachlan said "there's no one left to finger..."  Ha! showed her.
*Saturday*, DAMNIT, Saturday is Shabbat!
Thank you.
lawyers, doctors, engineers provide you with legal protection, health, and fancy ipod. Those jobs don't require compassion. But you also need bedside care, teachers, and soldiers to protect you.  Soldiers actaully might actually sacrifice their lives for the country. They are rarely paid as well as plumbers.
You're not doing the job for free.  They're paying through the nose for you to be there, and most of the population would prefer you weren't.  It's a bit of a sticky political issue.
They're just waiting for sweeps week.
You need some sun (natural light improves my mental health better then anything else), but my mother, who gets migraines from mere summer sunlight, is known to be abnormally well preserved. Ergo, no sun tanning for me.
By sending him an email you got joined to the mailing list
&gt; The other thing you can do is look at what it takes to build wealth. Going by all the statistical evidence, your best bet is to be born wealthy. Or to win the lottery. &gt; After all, we all have to deal with the vagaries of chance. Umm, which statistical data have you looked at to come to that conclusion? &gt; I'm going to stick with the middle road and say it can be a liability. I don't look at the world as black and white. Heh, and what have I said about averaging? The best way to learn about the world is to assume the opposite of what the authorities are trying to sell you. And progressively resolve all the contradictions involved, using reasoning and meta-reasoning, until you arrive at a unique singular truth. Hierarchical power is superior only when the costs of communications and coordination are prohibitive. And even then, building a progressive movement based on hierarchical power is stupid since the authorities will always be able to outspend you on logistics. What's more, even if *you* are the authorities and secure in your power (because logistics is expensive) it's still not a good idea. Hierarchical power has such grievous disadvantages to it that it is best to reduce it by turning it over to real democratic control. Fascism 'works' under such an absurdly small set of circumstances that it's accurate enough to say it never works.
"His defense that it wasn't his job to publicly contradict the admin at the time is valid." They started a war.  It's not about your job, it's an obligation to the country and the world.
Frank Rich is a pissy bitch. He should go back to doing theater reviews.
"This blog has been deleted"
Many recruits honestly believe that they're serving the people of their country by defending them from an impending threat.  Ignorance is not the same as stupidity or arrogance.
Unless they all share one.
Also, Republicans and Democrats in Congress should not be friendly. Right?
Ow. Ow. Ow. ;_;
A trip to Good Vibrations could have done the same thing.
You have completely misunderstood what that graph means. It shows the changes in summer insolation at northern latitudes caused by Milankovitch cycles, ie. orbital changes of the earth. It has nothing whatsoever to do with changes in solar radiation. They are most likely the cause for the ice ages, via ice albedo and CO2 feedbacks. You may be interested to know that we are currently at a minimum, so these are hardly responsible for the current warming. I have a post about that on my blog: http://fermiparadox.wordpress.com/2007/04/08/milankovitch-cycles-and-the-arctic-climate-in-the-early-holocene/ And the cosmic ray flux has not changed since the fifties: http://fermiparadox.wordpress.com/2007/04/14/no-correlation-with-cosmic-rays/ 
Zerg rush anyone?
What gets me is that the War on Drugs folks trumpet the fact that joints have carcinogens in them *and* bemoan the trend toward smaller, more concentrated doses of marijuana. Stronger pot -&gt; less pot consumed -&gt; less cancer risk. How is this a bad thing?
Here come my fantasies!
More specific: http://www.realclimate.org/index.php/archives/2005/10/global-warming-on-mars/ 
If you want to charge proportionally go by road damage, which is approximately proportional to the cube of the axle loading. So bikes should pay 0.000125x car tax or 0.000001x truck tax.
How come there are nothing but white racist sites reporting this? Not one local paper? Where is the original source?  I call shenanigans...
Bill Moyers did it just last week.  Quote after quote of Bush administration officials (or Bush himself) attempting to tie all of these things together.  If they say otherwise, it is yet another obvious lie.
How about "a non-negative body image even though they were at BMI's that current medical science deems to be unhealthy".   Hoorah for them, overcoming the patriarchal medical scientists need to catagorize them as unhealthy and fat. Take back the fat!
Downmod for title bearing as much resemblence to content as a packet of mixed nuts does to the entire  west wing of the Sirian State Mental Hospital.
&gt;I think what the author is getting at is what Dawkins talks about in The God Delusion. We, as Liberals, value diversity. We love the variety of ways different people of different cultures choose to live their lives. We love people and freedom.  Why does your response allude to only Liberals appreciating diversity?
&gt; Going by all the statistical evidence, your best bet is to   &gt; be born wealthy. Or to win the lottery. Only if you want multi-millions. You don't need to have the money of Bill Gates to be well off. &gt; Umm, which statistical data have you looked at to come to   &gt; that conclusion? Living life. I've had hard knocks that I wouldn't have predicted - the vagaries of chance. But, though I had to struggle to pick myself back up, I always made it through in the end. &gt; The best way to learn about the world is to assume the   &gt; opposite of what the authorities are trying to sell you.   &gt; And progressively resolve all the contradictions involved   &gt; until you arrive at a unique singular truth. I buy that, though I'm very skeptical of those selling "truths".
&lt;quote&gt; ""until women in heterosexual marriages are not giving up their names/identities with greater frequency than men,""  Its a big leap to say that your name affects how much you make.&lt;/quote&gt; Actually, it's not that these women experience name-based discrimination... instead, it's that as long as the tradition continues for women to dispose their own names and replace it with their husbands', our culture remains conditioned to think of women as second-to-men.
Ah, malcontent. Always stirring the pot, aren't we?
I thought more muscle mass lowered your BMI?
That's because it's not about **cheap** oil.  It's about keeping Iraqi oil in the hands of American{1} business interests.  The price for the consumer is a secondary issue. &amp;nbsp; {1} as American as a multi-national corporation can be in this age.
Even Bush got a Purple Heart.
There is a measurable difference.  You mean noticeable difference.  And that's a subjective measurement, some people have better colour vision then others. What I think you're missing is that apart from energy efficiency CFLs are inferior in every way.  There may be a minimum standard people will accept -- you can't expect people to abandon a lifetime of "flick the switch, lights come right on". The whole issue is better solved by raising electricity prices.  If you like real bulbs you can use less AC.  Let people make their own choices.
guys, i admit tht myspace is a bit stupid, but shut up about it. The fact is, people use it, and they tell their friends, who tell thier friends...no other site matches up. It's not about the fact tht it crashes and its crappy, there are too many people who use it, and the number of users isnt gonna drop anytime soo. So chill about it.
If its true love, drinking beer is something you will do together.
Hardly in-depth.
Typical alliance behavior.   Always a 3 on one fight.  
Good music,rock type music
hiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii
Heh. I just figured I'd see what was produced by objdump on an file with that binary string.
Anecdotes are not data, but here's mine: I'm a white guy.  I and a bunch of my little white friends got a nice public education, paid for mostly by our elderly neighbors, most of whom were far from rich, and some of whom sacrificed some comfort to pay their property taxes. That was pretty cool of them.   My undergraduate university gave me a pretty nice scholarship, based mostly on what I did with the nice things my nice neighbors handed me.  That was pretty cool of them.  My state university literally paid me to go to graduate and prof school.  I earned it, but that was pretty really, really cool of them.  I haven't always nailed every job I've wanted, but when I've been bested, it's generally been by somebody better qualified, not somebody better pigmented.  Sure, I knew a few people in grad/prof school who got race-based help they didn't necessarily desrve, but for every one of those people, I can name two similar scholarship recipients who really were unique, talented, and utterly deserving of a hand up.  Those people didn't go to nice elementary schools.  They excelled where success was the exception and not the rule.  Several are heading up NGOs and doing public interest work that would make anybody proud.  I'm not mad; I'm grateful.  I'll put up with it, alright, and I'll donate what money I can to the scholarship funds of the schools that helped me out, so that they can do the same for others, whatever their color.  They've exhibited pretty good judgment so far as I can see.  Part of that means extending chances to unusual people. Can identity politics become unfair?  Sure.  We can and should deal with that on a case-by-case basis.  Ward Churchill, anyone?  In the meanwhile, make mine light on the indignation.   
I don't buy the official line on WTC based on my engineering experience, but even I think this article is total bullshit.
Or: Obese twice as likely to be lesbians.
One guideline for programming which has served me well is that code should fail as easily as possible when a bug creeps up somewhere. For example, if you have a fixed-length array, it is an extremely bad idea to tack a couple extra elements onto the end to "prevent" overrun errors. The error is still there, it's just masked by what I would consider a poor programming choice. Although it's verbose, one of the things I do appreciate about XML (and which apparently was hotly debated when it was designed) is that this verbosity makes certain errors easier to detect and fix. In general, I think the space of correct expressions should be made as narrow as possible, so that any misunderstanding on the part of the author becomes apparent early on.
What about the illegal occupation and defacto apartheid in Israel isn't true?  Other than the fact that they kill reporters who try to expose it? http://www.exposingisraeliapartheid.com/ Come on, this is an obvious smear payback for him trying to tell the truth.
While the name is relatively new, open source as a concept existed long before OSI.
I wouldn't call him vitriolic, vitriol is strong and caustic. CH is more like warm dog urine.
&gt;This is because I too am a minority and am brown Please try not to take this as offense, but your overall position may be viewed as reverse racism or bigotry.  &gt;(cos apparently we all look alike to you). Does this really help?
It uses the lotion or else it gets the hose.
I thought that it was actually that the extra hot water used by McDonalds allowed marginally more coffee to be extracted from the beans, thus marginally increasing McDonalds profit at  the minor inconvenience (to McDonalds) of excessive and severe  burns to their customers.
Cheeni Kum
Starbucks coffee maker spout temperature....  http://www.starbucksstore.com/products/shprodde.asp?SKU=674057  180 Degrees McDonalds coffee lawsuit temperature...  http://www.vanfirm.com/mcdonalds-coffee-lawsuit.htm  180 Degrees
well, you can't call him a liberal shill.
For a troll, that was kinda good.
That is true.  What I mean is the ruling is a small step toward rationalizing the patent system and feretting out rent seeking.  By striking at bogus patents, it strengthens legitimate ones.
One would hope that they will give up their pointless pseudo-morality and choose whatever path serves them best.
&gt;rather the DSL semms to consists almost entirely of bollerplate Lol, too true.
pics, or it didn't happen
I like the last question which assumes no answer but asserts a false test of discrimination against christianity. More people rail against christianity becaues it is the most hypocritical. Nobody responds well to those who are stubborn AND wrong AND hypocritical.   
True, but then we'll need Marlboros for afterwards.  Guess we're just droppin' the Coke.
there's a very large amount of work refuting the main claims of this article.  And I don't think any of the mostly men here are doing much googling.  Grabbing at random.  http://www.reuters.com/article/topNews/idUSN2029109620070423?feedType=RSS  citing studies that show  the 75% sized wage gap when accounting for profession, hours worked and maternity.  So you'd want to balance the different opinions, even if you want to eventually take as gospel truth what the free market ideologue site says.  It continues to be disheartening to see the quick vote downs of comments and posts that don't verify to the male audience here that feminism is over and men and women are all equal here, whereas, mysoginist silliness often rises to the top page.   And more disheartening is how much of this is my current and future coworkers in the computer industry, where direct, in your face, totally obvious gender discrimination happens every day.   It's enough to make you want to take a pink collar job.
Open-source is just what it sounds like. Don't let OSI re-define it into something more than that. How about using free-source? ;)
Randy Tobias is a dick. This poll is for fun.
Compare over 300 insurers to find you the best Quotes for Car, Home, Pet and Travel insurance... Hundreds of products to choose from. You WILL save
I was always partial to the uneccesarily jumping [children](http://www.fotosearch.com/comp/PHD/PHD600/200158884-001.jpg).
Nope. [citation needed]
please don't assert speculative comments such as these as fact.  It is not useful to me to know that some guy thinks some thing about wind power.  If you actually have some analysis, even a sketchy one, or a link to some useful information, share it.  Otherwise, what's the point of response?
These things run in cycles. As Supreme Court Justice Robert Jackson wrote in 1949, "The only valid patent is one which this Court has not been able to get its hands on."
Ahem. Please note "anc**ie**nt" and "sc**ie**ntist", n**ei**ther which [seem](http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=scientist) to have [come](http://dictionary.reference.com/search?q=ancient) to English via German.
Very impressive. 2 out of 3 sources that don't even meet wikipedia's dubious quality standards.
Fair enough. Just curious.
What he said.  Regardless of whether you are a conspiracy 'whack job' any thinking person will recognize that the two situations bear no comparison to each other.
No, they aren't. There's nothing dirty about breasts -or- hair. Just our culture says that hair is bleh and breasts are forbidden. Granted that the Iranians probably shouldn't be cracking down on hair, but neither should we be so prudish about harmless, fatty chest lumps with milk ducts.
It is the best insurance site
Mission [Accomplished](http://www.americansunitedforchange.org/blog/entries/mission_accomplished/).
mixiの方は見られないんで、見られる人興味深いのがあったら教えてください
-Einstein-. Not Scientist, you goose.
The Guardian in the UK was a big anti-war voice.  The NYT likes to look like the naughty boy that acts tough and asks tough questions, but they never divert far from the established official standpoint.
I had the same question in my mind (How do 100 jets make the 2nd largest air force?) But maybe it will be the second largest in terms of the dollar-value if the sale goes through?
TRUTH
Japan has had the 2nd or 3rd largest navy for many decades.  Why shouldn't they have the 2nd largest air force?  There's *nobody* on this planet closer to the US these days.  Europe is pretty damn pissed, most of the middle-east wants us dead, and the rest of Asia is waiting safely on the sidelines to see what happens next.
Makes sense, although I get annoyed when its too strong. There is nothing like sitting down to smoke a full doobie. With a lot of grass these days, you take two rips and you are blasted out of your mind - I feel like you miss out on some of the enjoyment of the process.
"You know, one of the hardest parts of my job is to connect Iraq to the war on terror." --President George W. Bush, in an interview with CBS News Anchor Katie Couric
You say that with an awful lot of conviction for a position that is demonstrably false.
In perfect conditions jet fuel burns at 500 degrees. Office furniture, carpet and the like burn at 1800 degrees. For commercial steel to melt, and there are firemen who say they saw molten steel below the trade center, the temperatures have to be 2700 degrees. You can make your own decision with that.
Yea, it really does taste better. And just the chance that there may be health links between anti-biotics and hormones that they feed to non-organic fed cows is worth making the effort.  Lots of nasty compounds are fat-soluble.
What's really insane is having the same patent laws for the high-investment medical field and the ultra-low investment software field. The same amount of patent protection can retard development in one and support it in the other. Good luck getting a lawmaker that understands such nuances.
For the record, I have had two on in my garage 24/7 (long story) since Jan 2006.  Haven't replaced either. I love 'em.  Stopgap or no. 
maybe "hardcore cheapass"
I fell for the troll bait - my bad.
In other news: Pope Catholic; bear defecates in the woods.
That seems to depend on when the first immigrants from a family arrive in the country. The UK had a far flung empire long before the US became an immigrant magnet, so it makes sense that families that have been there longest feel the most "British".  But newer immigrants - especially from the areas obviously important in this discussion, just don't feel like being British. But that's a sore point isn't it?  "Britishness". http://www.britishness-test.co.uk/ Good luck :S ..... I think the sticking point in the difference between UK and US integration is actually best served by the degree of *assimilation*. Americans want a melting pot, and we want the immigrants to actually *melt* into us and add to soup.  It seems other countries prefer to remain a mixed bag - a "salad". Soup over salad! Huzzah!
Sure, I'm sure the majority of American's are for clean water also.  However, if you tell them this means making major sacrifices in their life, the numbers will drop very quickly.  It's all fine and dandy to say yeah sure we should stop global warming, even sociopaths like clean air.  It's a totally different proposition to get people to start making major (or shit even minor for that matter) changes to actually make anything happen...... If you don't believe me see the article from earlier today about the CF light bulbs.
Shah!  Wouldn't you?!
Prince Humiliates Paris Hilton
These are great places to swim. Ignore this article and all of it's sensationalized warnings.
[Don Imus](http://mediamatters.org/items/200704040011), anyone?
Where the article says that Japan will have the second-largest air force (repeated in the thread title) it is wrong. So I'm not saying I don't trust it, its just wrong. USA, Russia, China, India undoubtedly have more combat aircraft. There are several countries - UK, Israel, Egypt, Ukraine - that have similar (to Japan). So Japan at a pinch might have fifth largest, possibly 9th largest. There's a wealth of sources, some might even be accurate.
It's because her husband *wasn't* man enough, but he *did* come over and settle it. With three of his buddies.
The internets.
Oh you!
Elemental mercury can't be absorbed by eating it - you can drink elemental mercury without much danger. It is slightly dangerous to be around as it evaporates, as the vapor is toxic. However, it is unlikely that short term exposure to elemental mercury would be a problem.
Wasn't war in Iraq to capture Osama Bin Laden who may have had something to do with 9/11 ?
I'll give you a break because I believe you avoided thinking that statement through. Afterall, would you rather a portion of the taxes you already pay go towards preventing suicide or occasionally spend a few hours in a traffic jam because someone jumped off the overpass?
"Everybody gets pinched. But you did it right. You told 'em nothing and they got nothing...  I'm proud of you. You took your first pinch like a man and you learned the two greatest things in life...  Never rat on your friends and always keep your mouth shut." [Goodfellas](http://www.filmsite.org/goodf.html)
Agreed
I'd say that you are wrong if you think that people who kill themselves simnly "fail to appreciate life".
Or you could use mineral oil like various electronics have used for cooling forever and not have to worry about changing your oil every few months before it starts growing colonies of bacteria.
Interesting blog on the music industry and Los Angeles.
And how would a magnetic field cause cancer, exactly?
&gt;There is no way we could ramp up enough nuclear plants(thanks to the foresight of the screeching environmentalists of the 70's) or implement wind/solar alternatives in time to save our economy. Not if you maintain your current level of inefficiency and waste. Your sub-urban sprawl is a big problem, but there are plenty of places you could make huge savings in efficiency, but 100 years of cheap oil has blinded you to the possibilities.
2 hours???  Sheesh. Maybe 2 hours works if you want to negate the rest of your days health, but you should be drinking constantly, imo. Rather, not constantly, but whenever you are thirsty, take a good swig from the bottle. Dehydration only leads to poor performance on and off the bike. Compound that with the shitty-feeling you get, and it just makes more sense to keep a full bottle. That said, a single full bottle should last you for a 2-3 hour ride, if you sip. Human bodies need fuel, and that fuel is water and a good meal beforehand.  Finally, the ultimate-pre-ride meal consists of a bagel (plain), peanut butter, and slices of banana in between. All of the ingredients are pure energy, and the potassium in bananas helps fight cramps. Pedal Pedal Pedal!  Edit - Ill also say, splurge on a good waterbottle. The crappy ones can be uncomfortable or inconvenient to use. You want a bottle with a soft nozzle that you can open and close with ease. Dont buy anything that will hinder your fuel intake :)
Love bombing too, and "group hate" type events, etc. The whole thing smells like cult for money. 
They will be!
TREASON  http://video.google.com/url?docid=7797944525480443766&amp;esrc=sr1&amp;ev=v&amp;q=mineta&amp;vidurl=http://www.youtube.com/watch%3Fv%3DbDfdOwt2v3Y&amp;usg=AL29H21OWOWcqwrKTnxo_owOomhQ9BA7Wg
I thought C was C, no matter what platform you write on.  Sure you won't be able to test the code perhaps, but code is code, isn't it?  If you knew what you were doing, you would also not run the risk of contaminating your own PC while working on it.
Same with god, but people still believe in the easter bunny.
404, even on the main page!
What was in that slashdot article? It seems to have been deleted.
The founders of this country were considered statesmen, they were there to serve the interest of the people, politicians now are the antithesis of a statesmen.  They are only interested in their self-interests.  Look at our campaign system, if you can't raise over 100million dollars then you will not be able to compete in the PRIMARIES, I am not even talking about the main election.  This is disgusting and by its very nature is going to lead to more "corporate" interests served because who do you think is donating a majority of these funds to the Obama, Clinton camps? I LOVE seeing individuals like Mike Gravel and Ron Paul getting attention, PLEASE KEEP IT GOING GUYS!
It's not as popular, and less common-denominator. There are beginning to be one-line jokes though.
"I never really understood the whole oil argument." [Oil Fields as Military Objectives: A Feasibility Study](http://www.mtholyoke.edu/acad/intrel/Petroleum/fields.htm) Why is this being downmodded? Before your time? Read... "The possible use of U.S. military force to occupy foreign oil fields in exigency first surfaced as a serious issue in January 1975. This paper provides perspective, so that the Congress if need be could participate most meaningfully in deliberations to determine the desirability and feasibility of any such action. Analysis indicates that sustained sanctions by all or most of OPEC's members would disrupt America's fundamental lifestyle and degrade U.S. security, although survival would never be at stake. By way of contrast, the vital interests of our major allies could quickly be compromised. Any decision to ease agonies at home and (if need be) assist allies would be conditioned by political, economic, social, legal, and moral factors, but if nonmilitary facets were entirely favorable, successful operations would be assured only if this country could satisfy all aspects of a five-part mission:  --Seize required oil installations intact.   --Secure them for weeks, months, or years.   --Restore wrecked assets rapidly.   --Operate all installations without the owner's assistance.   --Guarantee safe overseas passage for supplies and petroleum products.   American abilities to cope with steps one through four would be suspect if sabotage were the only serious threat. U.S. parachute assault forces are too few to cover all objectives quickly. Amphibious forces are too slow. Skilled teams could wreak havoc before we arrived."
Digg's Back!
Not in Western countries....so far.
It deserves #1 because it's a lawsuit that wasn't thrown out as it should have and actually wasted taxpayers' time and money.
Perhaps not regarded as such by the general public because they do not understand enlightenment.  It's possible to be a Buddhist or Buddhist monk your whole life and still not attain enlightenment.  It's a state of mind and is a change of behaviour - your whole outlook on life changes.  Christian repentance can still be achieved by paying lip service or behaving in a certain way sometimes, while still being a hypocrite at other times (still being affected by jealousy, pettiness, anger, greed, etc.)  When you reach enlightenment, you transcend bodily desires and reach a higher plane.  You really change mentally and reach a level of acceptance.  I guess some Christians can reach a similar state, but not often.
Now just a minute... this wasn't published on 4/1, that would have been my first guess.   Aside from the "Toilet in the Sky" issue there are zoning issues here at the very least.
This explains why I left Digg. What also makes it painfully obvious why I left is that the Admins keep deleting any post of this story to Digg.
But there would have to be delays, and each movement is a different length, and then there's the need to enhance the MIDI standard to include "audience shuffling feet nervously", which I don't believe is currently supported.
read the poll, they talk about just how far people are willing to go, you are right there does seem to be a limit to what actions people will take, for instance people were willing to pay higher taxes on gas if that money went to renewable energy research, but not willing to change their driving habits.  Its a pretty interesting poll.
Yes, thank you.  I fixed the spelling.
Jazz jam
Number 1 thing I don't want to hear my wife say: "Honey, do you know anyone named Brian Ross? His name was on our caller id." 
Okay, I shouldn't have assumed you were referring to all rich people, I apologize for that.  But you replied to the comment,  "And we should obviously steal from the rich. Theft is immoral, except when we steal with certain people."  With,  "If someone stole $5 dollars from me and I took it back without consent of the thief, would I be stealing or simply rightfully repossessing my own property?" The original comment was in relation to all rich people, so in addressing the comment you did not qualify your statement to include only "rich assholes" or whatever criteria you supposed was so patently obvious.   Besides that one sentence was a minor point in my overall discussion of the inefficiencies of government and increased taxation as a means of reducing economic disparity.  My opinion is that the government has the least motivation to empower the people.
page 1 stuff.
I know exactly what the guy is talking about. I've been doing the same for all of my adult live now (which is to say: since the 1980's). When the clock stares back at me, it doesn't show 2 pm, it's usually 4 am. But where I differ from him is that I almost always regret not having slept instead. Lacking sleep makes me unhappy, depressed, agressive, uncreative, unproductive -- compared to quite the oppsite when well rested. Not getting enough sleep is the root of all problems in my life. But what's the cause of the root, then? Why don't I sleep although I've realised long ago that I depend on it? I wish I knew... 
people would not starve. our farmers get paid not to grow food. the local weapons station here in SC throws tons of surplus food away because the state govt will request taxes if they give it local schools. thats rght: theyre punished for trying to give surplus food and supplies to schools. the state MUST have its cut and its cheaper to throw the food away than than to deal with taxes redistribution. the whole concept of us starving is ridiculous. its things like that which keep coward conservatives in line. witless scare tactics that control only half wits. a good place to look for the money to subsidize food and energy during our predicted 'shortage' would be the 9 billion surplus Exxon posted for this quarter last year. thats a start. then we can cut the salaries of these CEOs. and then... well, you get it.
If you had any level of familiarity with the issues at hand, you would know that while there may be controversy on the talk pages and the articles may not cite sources for *every* fact claimed, the ones I linked to more or less give an accurate picture of the subjects they refer to. How about you do a quick search around the web yourself, find something refuting the articles and *then* call credibility into question.
Sounds interesting, but is it restricted to Windows? If that is so it is pretty much worthless, imo.
The article points out major shenanigans post afghanistan war... namely the F16 sale
Pray tell, why not? The field of college scholarships is littered with money for blacks and Native Americans. What's good for the goose is good for the gander, right? Or are we only pretending we're in favor of free expression?
you mean a "rimshot"?
That's because the minute you open your mouth you get branded a racist and are ostracized.
なるほど。安井氏の意見は大きなところでは似たような主張に見えるのですが、細かいところで反目しあっててなにかもったいないような感じがします。 &gt; 現代の市場は環境負荷がコストに反映するしくみになっていない 武田氏の批判している点はまさにこのことで、(主に行政が)間違ったインセンティブをつけるので選択を誤ることがあり、そのためリサイクル増幅係数なるものをひねり出しています。  ペットボトルを高くしろ、と主張している安井氏と方向性は同じですが、武田氏はプラスチックの燃焼が専門の研究者なのでペットボトルから燃焼で高いエネルギーを取り出すことを目的としているのが違いになっている。   
But then you can't cook your fries in it
いやー、NetBSDって本当に素晴しいですね(棒読み
ぎくっ!
He's not here to answer this, but I feel I can speak for the Shah of Iran that yes, when he was deposed in 1979, he would have preferred to stay on until he'd gotten his $400,000 performance bonus.
My IQ is 55.
By not releasing this, ABC allows hypocrisy to continue, something that harms both those who are in the Escort business and any other sexually marginalized group. It's time that the religious hypocrites in the US are unmasked.  Escort services are not such a big deal.  So unveil the names, let them get red in the face, and let's move on.  This isn't hte 1950s!
Could you please keep the pants on your straw man?
If this really does violate the DMCA, what about these: d6febcda0f3b912a76ae6176d97a0-times-be.com 09f911029d74e35b7380752a84df9af4-xor-abc123efe7891234.com rot13-09s911029q74r35oq84156p5635688p0.com
Not saying that any heatproofing will be perfect, just adding more information for accuracies sake.
&gt; Fuel-based fertilizers and GMO crops are glorious inventions that have saved billions of lives. You're confusing the current GMO crops with the hybridization, irrigation, pesticides and fertilizers that made up the Green Revolution. I'm against GMO crops for various reasons. Going from the oppression that is intellectual property law, to the fact GMOs almost never improve productivity or performance but are aimed at deepening farmers' dependence. Ironically, the first GMO proposed (the Flavr Savr tomato) *would* have improved performance (it wouldn't have rotted once picked). But don't expect future improvements in yields because we are already near or at metabolic limits. And of course there's the fact that the downsides of the Green revolution still haven't been dealt with adequately and GMOs will address none of them. Frankly, I put much higher hopes on the Genomics revolution which will hopefully undo some of the damage done during the millenia of traditional breeding. &gt; I think the guy who invented GMO corn won a Nobel Prize Borlaug who made hybrid wheat in the 1960s, long before genetic engineering came on the scene. &gt; About 20% of US petroleum usage is expended in fertilizing, transporting, processing, and otherwise making food. This is such a fucking crock. Maybe in an agricultural state like [Minnesota](http://www.extension.umn.edu/newsletters/ageconomist/components/ag237-693b.html) (scroll to end) but certainly not averaged over the entire USA. Minnesota's primary crop is corn, it produced about 6% of the USA's total produce of corn (700 million bushels out of 11 billion). Meanwhile, Minnesota only has 5 million people which is 1.7% of the USA's population. This suggests that your 20% figure is overblown by a factor of 4. And don't drag fertilizers into it because the only fertilizer that consumes large amounts of hydrocarbons is ammonia whose [world production](http://www.efma.org/Publications/EUBook/Section10.asp) amounts to only 5-8% of natural gas. That's natural gas, not hydrocarbons. Mining itself doesn't consume that much energy, whether it's gold, phosphates, or uranium. And transportation is done by sea which consumes virtually nothing. Right now you're all naive but one of the things you'll learn with more experience is to never, EVER trust an eco- activist. If they say something less obvious than "my cat's breath smells of cat food" it needs double-checking. &gt; The US is unwittingly participating in a decades-long experiment to determine whether the USDA and FDA can effectively officiate food safety Oh well in that case we already know the outcome: they can't. Almost literally nothing the US government does is any good. The only thing worse than the US government, and there aren't many things worse because you're really scraping the bottom of the barrel there, is American libertarians. As for DDT, the World Health Organization [says it is safe](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/science/nature/5350068.stm) as well it should since the basis on which it was banned, mass hysteria after the publication of a pulp fiction novel called Silent Spring, was clearly irrational and contrary to all science. &gt; Organic food, like most movements, is populated primarily by uninformed zealots on both sides. And you should ask yourself why that is. Why it is that movements are primarily populated by uninformed people. Even better, ask yourself how it is *possible* for uninformed people to be zealots. Because it. Does. Not. Make. Sense. I'll probably blog about it sometime this week, though I already have [touched on the issue](http://richardkulisz.blogspot.com/2006/09/environmentalists-vs-animal-lovers.html). &gt; "organic" is the only food movement with sufficient consumer awareness  This is a crock. The Slow Food movement is much more likely to drive through changes. And the organic food movement has already been coopted by giant agribusiness.
Every single inch of propganda that our govt can utilize for their rationalizations of waging war WILL be used. If we, as liberated minds we believe ourselves to be, agree that they (mid-East) are dysfunctional then it suits the purpose of our imposing our version of reality upon them. It's hypoctical for the Gawd Dam Uynintud States Of Amurica to utilize how they approach the female in their culture until we have no issues with the Divine Feminine being able to be fully released here. We are a nation of hypocrites in our stand against the outside world... and using females as a scapegoat is outrageous. Is that simple enough for you?
機能が要らんのはたぶん売り手も了解してて、単にDRMのためなんでしょうね。 iTunes Music StoreのEMIみたいに、DRMやめて普通のPDFにしたら売り上げ3倍、とかすごくありそう。当分やらんだろうけど。
Why do you say Mercury doesn't do backtracking? Because it produces all output at once or something? Note I haven't used it, it just looks like it has what's necessary to produce what I think of as backtracking behavior, being, different answers from the same program.
*Mid*.
Here's a question I've had on my mind about software patents; anyone knowledgeable about patent law is encouraged to clear up any of my misconceptions that it makes obvious. My understanding of patents is that their purpose is to promote innovation by giving inventors protections for a set period of time in exchange for explaining their invention to the rest of the world so that it can be used and improved upon by future inventors once the patent expires. In order to do this, the patent has to be detailed enough so that the invention it describes can be recreated by a reader skilled in the arts it references. With physical inventions, a diagram and listing of components is in most cases sufficient. With software, however, the only absolutely accurate description of what the software does is its source code. To me, this says that if software is patentable the only valid application would include a source code listing. Anyone care to explain why this doesn't appear to actually be the case?   
I gave you a positive vote, because I really, really care! Come, let's hug and eat ice-cream.
&gt; Pesticides do not harm the environment, despite dedicated attempts of naturalist groups to find some kind of facts to back up their fear propaganda. *no harm* ? putting a dent in the 'pest' population, even in the least harmful way imaginable, will have knock on effects in a complex ecology, so your statement becomes meaningless.
Read through some of that site, more than just the piece linked to here.  I think the author has his head on pretty straight - calling him a "hardcore cheapass" is more of a reflection of your own values than of his.
linkjacked :(
No, you're not. If buying a Prius and some CFLs makes you think that you're no longer accountable for the environment, then maybe you should reconsider. CFLs help. Not a lot, in the grand scheme of things. A Prius will help. But it won't eliminate your carbon footprint, and you certainly haven't eliminated your personal responsibility to the environment.
I guess people just don't even care anymore.
And yet...our army is still stationed in all three of their countries. Interesting...
Well the benchmarks are from January 2006. But on the plus side at least is was dated.
These show the most rural and horrible parts of China.  Most of the country isn't like this at all.  The photographer is taking pictures of the hillbillies of the equivalent of backwoods Arkansas or Catskills mountains and giving the impression of the people barely being civilized.  Having traveled across a good part of China, I can attest that while many parts are poor, these photos are extreme.
The primary reason it is not OSI approved is that MS never submitted it for approval.  The other reason it isn't quite ideal is that it lists Microsoft specifically as the licensor, which makes it non-reusable, which is kind of a pain. But, for any reasonable definition of open source, Ms-PL fits.
Apparently, in Marijuana they are worried about having 36% of a harmless chemical.  Yet in alcohol, you can buy Diesel liquor; which is 95% of a TOXIC chemical.
Also, leetspeak only when being leetspoken to.
Could it be that they like a continuous spectrum to see by? I find that under CFL some colors are just off, especially in the blue-green end. You know the weird way those yellow sodium street lights affect color? I think it's something similar, the phosphors are pure colors and they're hitting near but not on the color tone my eyes expect to see. It's a constant minor irritant.
I intend on living for more than another 30 years....
And the virtual "brain" isn't even differentiated -- all the neurons are the same.
How does drinking inspire true love? I've heard of drinking inspiring comatose sex... but not true love.
If they stop blogging because of that, they're just giving the trolls what they want. The best course of action is to ignore them. When bloggers shut down theirs sites because of this behavior, this just confirms for the perpetrators that their actions are effective, and thus encourages them to continue.
What does .5C on Mars have to do with .5C on Earth? They have totally different environments and different solar exposure. The .5C is nothing more than coincidence. Mars is, for the most part, a barren planet whereas the environment on Earth has been modified over millions of years by Life to create a stable environment buffered by countless checks and balances like a complex atmosphere, clouds, oceans, geothermal activity, etc. And of course Life itself regulates this environment so when all of these are overcome enough to push the average temperature one way or the other, it is more of a concern to Earthlings, while the Martians have probably adapted to the wild temperature swings.
The gasoline that melted the comparatively (to a floor of the WTC) small amount of steel in the bolts and frame of that freeway was estimated to have reached 3000F.  Jet Fuel has an open air burn temp of &lt;= 600F.  Here's a nice article debunking the jist of this reddit post's title... "Freeway Collapse Bears No Relation To WTC Buildings"  http://prisonplanet.com/articles/april2007/300407freewaycollapse.htm 
Action must be taken now to stop a power grab by Al Gore and the UN
Incredible!
I'd rather stab you gently.
Depends whether the people you vote in are grown up enough to form stable coalitions and work together to govern in the interests of the people that voted them in.   There is absolutely nothing (other than pride) stopping the two largest parties from forming a coalition to avoid having some lunatic minority party driving their agenda. There is no conceivable case in which a minority party can "tell the majority what to do", unless the majority wants it that way.
These are fine points but here are some more, related. Don't rely solely on a single U-lock. That's only going to lock one of your wheels and thieves, not "might" but "will" steal that unlocked wheel. I tend to use a U-lock on the front wheel and frame and a cable lock looped through the seat, into the frame and into the back wheel. A novel, but nonetheless good rule of thumb is to lock your bike securely next to a bike of higher value that is locked poorly. Yes, street parking roads will give you more room but... beware of opening car doors! When biking in the dark, cars tend to give you more room and respect if you have lights. Wear a helmet. Of course you never wipe out on your bike, not since you were what, 6? Well, if you're speeding down a downgrade and someone in the parking lane throws open their door, your head is almost definitely going to strike pavement.
why is this on reddit?
I was implying that interests are not always easy to tell.  When you just whole heartedly think something is valid (al-jazeera) then maybe you are letting your guard down is all. I am saying that there is a reason you know about al-jazeera, you didn't seek it out, it reached you.  Anything that reaches you without some effort is usually programming and for particular interests.
Come on, people. We're talking about urban commuting. If it takes you 2-3 hours, you're going to be late for work. And if you need bananas and peanut butter, you're working too hard. Remember, you have to spend the rest of the day at work.
30 years. So let's see that would have been 1977. In 1977 people had no computers, shitty automobiles, no CFLs, no LEDs, shitty television, no internet. In 1977, people still remembered the Green Revolution as recent and they were worried about nuclear weapons, not biological weapons. You are of course worried about agrochemicals running out in 30 years because 30 years is such a short time that technology doesn't fundamentally change. But don't you worry your pretty little head sweetheart, if Russia runs out of natural gas in 30 years, production of ammonia will switch to Australia and other countries with long coal reserves. It will just become 50% more expensive.
Congrats, you've been here 8 months, get over yourself
By "national radio", they mean "Coast to Coast", which apparently means the chupacabra threat has ended.
Well, here's the story that brought the law to national attention and mockery: http://www.ling.upenn.edu/~kurisuto/sodomy.html
Now you only need a forklift to move your PC out when plugging anything into or out of the back of it!
McGovern tells it like it is. On the other hand, what happened to Tucker Carlson?  No bow tie, seems to almost be sane in this clip.
Gotta love a good rimshot. Wait, no. That's something else.
But how much money did it cost the defendants? Re Oliver Stone being sued: &gt;Stone and the others involved with the film were added in 1996. The portion of the case aimed at Stone and his associates was dismissed in 2001. 5 years of legal fees?  It's not clear that the judge made the plaintiffs pay those legal fees. Many of these suits are brought not because they expect the judge to keep them going, but because they expect the defendants to settle rather than spending money to fight the case trying to get it dismissed, and furthermore, risking the possibility that the judge won't throw it out and that it'll make it to trial.
the cia is a terrorist organiztion
What change up "The National Enquirer" and "The Star" of the web?    
Amazon uses ajax in many spots, its just not in your face.  Typically for some things where it really helps the user experience but isn't very flashy.
You see, when a person speaks their mind in the real world - they think it's their right to attack that person personally.  Now that people can't be held "accountable" they are completely at a loss of how to deal with it.
Next time, read the article.
haha this is sooo ture :)
Obama is better than Clinton, but I'd much prefer to see [Gravel](http://www.gravel2008.us/) than either of those two.   I don't get why people consider Hilary "liberal" in the sense the word is used in the US, if anything she is a "moderate" Democrat like Bill (moderate in this case means Republican-lite).
By "victim culture", what do you mean? Not trying to sound inflammatory, just not familiar with the phrase.
Ron Paul is awesome. But I don't feel he's quite on-target about Iraq as Gravel. Ron has a great economic focus but I've never heard him call bullshit on the military-industrial complex or accuse other candidates of supporting preemptive nuclear strikes. Plus, now that Fox has their hooks into the debate, I'm not sure we'll be seeing Ron.
Yes, and I'd like to not be fired from my job with the giant, giant company that pays my bills.
Cool.
A study from Princeton was conducted on affirmative action which showed 80% of affirmative action spots were actually taken from Asian applicants (not white). http://www.princeton.edu/main/news/archive/S11/80/78Q19/index.xml?section=newsreleases  "Removing consideration of race would have little effect on white students, the report concludes, as their acceptance rate would rise by merely 0.5 percentage points."  "Asian students would fill nearly four out of every five places in the admitted class not taken by African-American and Hispanic students..."  So yeah, I hope antifolkhero and dublinclontarf would hold on to their belief regardless of whether they would be personally affected.
We'd also appreciate reasonably brief headlines that actually summarize the thing they link to. Real-world newspapers don't print headlines like "Hey, Guess What? Turn to page A7 to find out!", and it's not just because they're "old outmoded medias". 
Did they include the methane this time?  Just two years ago they didn't even know that plants generated the vast majority of methane in the atmosphere.  IMHO, it sure brings into question their absolute certaintly of man made global warming.
Apparently they don't like it...  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Administrators%27_noticeboard/Incidents#I.27m_not_entirely_certain_if_this_is_a_big_deal.2C_but...
Amen brother. Seriously, can you imagine trying to pack that monster up for a LAN party? You'd most definitely have to drain it before you did. And that just seems impractical to me.
Amen to that; impeach the fucker.
Green.  :(
Because she's ugly.
&gt; Only if you want multi-millions.  But honey, that was YOUR assumption. You said, and I quote, "Let's say that your goal is to be wealthy." I don't know about you but a 'fortune' nowadays is defined as in excess of 250 million. Frankly, with the amount of inflation we've had recently I wouldn't be surprised if it was set at a cool billion. So I'd peg "wealthy" as *at least* 100 million, 'comfortable' at 10 million, and a few million as a nest egg. &gt; Living life. I've had hard knocks that I wouldn't have predicted - the vagaries of chance. But, though I had to struggle to pick myself back up, I always made it through in the end. So let me get this straight. Your basis for saying that **we all** have to deal with chance is ... you (singular). Right?
Hopeseekr got a girlfriend!? Jeez, I leave for a few months and look what happens!
Really long, descriptive headlines are annoying and make it unnecessary to visit the link.
I think someone needs to inform them that copyrights are dead,
I wonder if one's self counts?
Depends on which UTF you want. Regardless, you can look it up by the Unicode code-point, which is U+263A. The frowning version is U+2639. My personal favorite is the snowman, U+2603. ☃
Ever heard of BitMover or the robotic parking garage in Hoboken, New Jersey?
The conclusions of this report are SEVERELY AT ODDS with the media images I have been exposed to!
Tonight's episode of How I Met Your Mother combined two of my favorite things -- Barney and The Price is Right -- for a full half hour of laughs.
hehe 
&gt; The price for the consumer is a secondary issue. Yeah, right.
There's a simple way to avoid that scenario if you're involved in a high speed chase: pull over.
The history of the world is spent preparing for futures that never come, and against armies that never invade. We may never know how many of those futures were staved off by such preparations.
they can share one.
By "elder Redditors," you mean "100 or so people who regularly comment and 10,000 blogspam site operators who could really use some Adsense clicks," right? I'm kidding. Seriously though, I think part of the problem is that people use automated submit buttons on articles that already have poorly formatted titles. The other part of the problem is that people in general are lazy slobs who can't string a coherent sentence together to save a puppy's life. LOLZ!
Tons of stuff available for beta download - IIS 7, Dot Net framework 3.5, Orcas and Silverlight
No, this is different. Most see the media as being the fourth estate, ultimately keeping the three real branches of government honest. That is intrinsically a confrontational relationship, where the media and lawmakers are often at odds. If the two groups are close friends who hang out all the time, then it makes it difficult for the media to be unbiased.
BINGO. They are willing to give up new technology which they normally wouldn't even think of. Whats more is its 100 planes, which is a shitload for an air force.  The US military is worried about China's military power and obviously Japan and US has some kind of plan to counter it.
And the angel said unto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found favour with God. 31 And, behold, thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a son, and shalt call his name JESUS. 32 He shall be great, and shall be called the Son of the Highest: and the Lord God shall give unto him the throne of his father David: 33 And he shall reign over the house of Jacob for ever; and of his kingdom there shall be no end. 34 Then said Mary unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know not a man? 35 And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy Ghost shall come upon thee, and the power of the Highest shall overshadow thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God. 
Nope. BMI is strictly height versus weight. The more weight, the more 'fat' you are. And muscle weighs more than fat. It works great for agregates of large individuals, as long as you can be certain that all your sample groups have the same levels of activity, racial makeup, diet, etc - or whatever you aren't trying to control for. But otherwise, it's pretty much worthless. My opinion - it's pretty much worthless on it's own.  On it's own being the operative term. If lesbian have twice the BMI of heterosexuals, something worth investigating is going on. &gt;Not&lt; something worth announcing to the press in such confident terms, unless you are trying to further your career rather than further science. That said as a, San Franciscan with every shape and type of friend :&gt; I can certainly see either side of the debate making sense, or there being no difference at all.
It was an effective media stunt.  These guys didn't just enjoy free expression; they enjoyed free publicity by baiting some student government kids.  Good for them, I guess.  Their point, though they certainly may express it, is completely tedious.  One hint you're not being seriously censored is when your message is covered by the New York Times and goes viral on the interwebs. If you have a NYT subscription, check out Stanley Fish's blog, fish.blogs.nytimes.com, which suprisingly teases some insight out of this otherwise boring rehash.
I call BS. If it's perfectly legal to offer scholarships to minorities, it should be perfectly acceptable to offer it to white males. It's hypocritical. Not all white males are rich and privledged.  I'm not saying that we don't have an advantage in this country in general, but that is no reason to deny scholarships to those who need them. It's reverse racism.
richardkulisz? is that you?
I tried asking that once; it didn't take :/
Actually, this was pre-destined and 60 years in the making.  The Federal Reserve Central Bank's philosophy that you can create real wealth by printing up money and loaning it out had pre-destined the US to become over-saturated with debt and inflation.  Well, now we are.  There is no way to clear out all the excessive debt and all excessive money pumped into circulation without hyperinflation and a great depression.  
Yeah. Patriarchal medical scientists, trying to tell womyn that the data shows that the leading cause of female death is heart disease, that 3/4 of men and women, ahem womyn, are going to get diabetes in their lifetimes, that the sedentary lifestyle has become so extreme that it requires treating as it's own disorder and that american women exercise over 30 minutes per day less than men despite near identical amounts of leisure time. Those bastard patriarchs.... 
$0.
Yes, Pepsi should ignore the environment and instead donate their money to somewhere in Africa.  That makes total sense.
Cheney first, then Bush. If this can be proven, it will lead to Cheney's impeachment.
Totally. The CFL in our dimmer-controlled overhead light crapped out yesterday, and I've gone almost everywhere to find one: Target, Ace, OSH, Kmart, and Home Depot, in that order. Nobody has dimmable CFLs, and some (OSH and Home Depot) only have store-brand—not even a real brand like Philips or Sylvania or even GE. I'll be trying Lowe's tomorrow, but my hopes are low. It's frustrating. [UPDATE from the next day: Neither Lowe's nor Wal-Mart had any. I guess I will be suffering with an incandescent.]
Then donate $ to his campaign?
[citation needed]
Speaking as an artist and a person who's very visually aware of colors and things around them - these bulbs suck. My husband wants them in the house - but the light these things put out screw the colors of everything around you up. You may not notice much, but get a pack of that colored construction paper or a painting and look at it outdoors under good sunlight, under these horrible bulbs, and under incandescant bulbs. Three different appearances. We have thse evil bulbs in one fixture in our house - the rest are incandescent, and my studio has a big window for sunlight, and I've spent entirely too much money on good natural daylight bulbs. Flourescent for the lose.
Yeah, right. edit: To elaborate: the bulk of your analysis is faulty because the freeway was not supporting 20 to 30 floors of steel and concrete building above it.
Yes, you can type how you want; thanks for the demonstration. We can point and laugh at you, as I'm about to demonstrate. \*point\* \*laugh\*
I'm pretty sure the quote was "...the most impressive...", but close 'nuff.
&gt;There are grounds for wondering whether the Republican party will survive Why should it? It deserves an ignominious death.
Well I don't think most men are any more satisfied with their careers than vikingprincess with hers. But men are just expected to accept it. That's _their_ traditional role. So our little princess doesn't want that kind of responsibility. Whatever. I'm not impressed.   
It's just a Web site people.
Subtle undertones?  I must say I enjoy the show very much but it's far from subtle in its message.  It's one of its flaws. They do exaggerate every point they show to the level of being ridiculous.
コメント書いたあとなんですが、安井氏のサイトの最近の記事なども読んでいたら非常に面白いです。  http://www.yasuienv.net/ ひと通り眺めてからまた考えてみないと..。
&gt; I don't know about you Apparently not. We all have our own definitions of wealth.  Are my definitions wrong? So be it. It works for me. &gt; we all have to deal with chance  What world do you live in where you don't have to deal with chance? Do you really lead a life where everything is safe and predictable? I wouldn't want to live that way, because it would be so boring. I hope I'm not the only one!   
In the spirit of, err..., multi-capitalism, peoplE shoulD bE ablE tO capitializE anY waY theY wantT anD stilL bE accepteD.
But only in the headlines, not in comments. If you use proper grammar in comments, you get downmodded into oblivion, and told to put down the thesaurus and to remove various kitchen utensils from your body cavities. http://reddit.com/info/1lljt/comments
I'm way too high to read that long article.
In the spirit of, err..., multi-capitalism, peoplE shoulD bE ablE tO capitializE anY waY theY wantT anD stilL bE accepteD. 
The deer head is tacky; I'd be laughing inside at anyone who actually bought that.  And why do people keep saying it's a moose?
And no derivations of reddit should be capitalized unless they start a sentence. redditor, redditite, reddit user, etc.
Where I live, there is little difference in price between the local farmer's market and the supermarkets.  In fact, many items for sale at the farmer's market aren't even local.  Don't be lulled into thinking that just because it's a local market it's cheaper or even local.  (I am only speaking for my region, of course.) 
Link broken, can someone explain what it was?
Really long, descriptive headlines are great because they make it unnecessary to visit the link.
Because the dolar is just a stock certificate for US, Inc. Is there a graph of the US stock market with the values converted to Euros?  In other words, was the recent 13,000 "record" significant or is the true "value" of the market flat or even falling in terms of Euros? No, using Euros is not what I want.  That's just another stock certificate.  It doesn't make sense to me to track stocks in terms of more stocks. I'd like to see a plot of stock market value in terms of barrels of oil.  Now that would be interesting.  How are US stocks doing in terms of the most important and foundational thing we have to buy, energy.
Keep talking shit and Hans will bust a cap in your ass, oakland style
Nearly everyone who has taken undergrad Agriculture will tell you that Organics and Inorganics have the same nutrient content. They'll also tell you that chicken is gross.
I hope it's made clear that there are two different classes of super-rich people.  Class A made their wealth thru hard work, planning, efficient use of capital, and investment.  Class B made their wealth thru government regulations, artifical government assisted monopolies (like the FCC and the copyright cartel), and being 1st in line for new money that is printed up from the Federsl Reserve Banking cartel.   Of course, the solution to this "corrupt wealth" is not to tax the rich.  The honest rich didn't make their money thru robbing banks, but because we chose to buy their stuff and use their services.  Now to turn arround and say the rich owe us because we didn't use the same opportunities they did is bullshit.  The solution is to kill off and attack the corruption and the poor belief systems that make the corrupt wealth possible.   
If you were the schmuck just trying to run his business and keep your trucks looking somewhat respectable, how would you feel if some kid tagged them all over? Regardless of what the message is, why is this lauded? Its pretty easy to setup a website these days and rant and rave all you want, and best part is another person's property doesn't get get tagged.
current electric engines use too much power.
How about the wife just comes over and blows me and I'll cover their dryer bills.  Mongoloids.
Yes, I am not in agreement of people of different religious backgrounds forming their own judiciary system to govern themselves with in a society with a diverse citizen body such as Britain - but if you are going to give them freedom of speech then allow them to do as they wish. It is their choice, after all. Someone please explain to me why freedom of speech advocates are unwilling to tolerate an ideology that they do not agree with.
so, when you talked to these firefighters, did they mention that when you heat furniture, (stain treated) carpet, etc they start to give off hydrocarbons, which combust at lower temperatures, and escalate the temperature of a room rapidly?  It is called flashover. Otherwise, your argument is that if I pour jet fuel into the middle of an office building, it would burn itself out as there would be no fuel which could burn at its "low" temp.  So has every high-rise fire in the world been started by governments or pyrotechnics?  Using your logic, and the fact that wood burns at less than 1800 degrees, after every house fire you should see carpet and file cabinets unscathed in the ruins.  Do you know how hot the flame of a match is?  You can start a fire with the flame of a match, and that house fire can reach over 2100F in a matter minutes.  So, using your logic that match would have to burn at at least 2100F for that to happen, correct?  And the way you are saying it, at 2699F, the steel would look fine.  Do you know at what temp it fails at?  Or are you just interested in how hot it has to be to be a liquid?  You think you could have steel at 2100F and have it hold up a building?
I consider it the punishment they get for not being libertarian enough.
Some more good pics [here](http://www.volcanodiscovery.com/volcano-tours/volcanoes/africa/tanzania/lengai_volcano.html"weirdest volcano")
Only a complete nutjob can look at the bungled Iraq War while claiming that the same government is capable of pulling off such a precise, and well planned operation (9/11) without a hitch and without anybody noticing.
Gimp Is Mimicking Photoshop
CFLs are not meant for reading. They do not produce anywhere near the same light spectrum as a regular incandescent. Its missing a shitload of color and most doctors do not advise reading using a CFL light bulb.
If e.e. cummings shows up on reddit I will not complain about his (lack of) capitalization.
Now that it's close to time for Livingston Fagan to be turned over to INS for deportation... Q: What really happened at Waco? A: The FBI, especially the hostage negotiators, were stretched too thin and exhausted -- exacerbated by the Lucasville Prison Riot happening at the same time.
Most of the current administration preaches that you'll go to hell if you have pre-marital sex, let alone lay with a prostitute. These guys were righteous enough to make my on-line poker illegal because it offended their morality. If they're breaking their own rules then fuck 'em. Plaster it all over the 6 o'clock news.
I think schools had a huge effect on the internet. Also, freedom of information is exactly what capitalism is fighting against (Digital Rights Management). It's not profitable to have things be free, everything should be owned.
7) Plane didnt smash into it
No, don't ruin the fun of Redditors who choose to focus on certain aspects of the article that relate to their own point.
A big myth is that these dentistry laws and regulations protect the consumer.  They don't.  All they do is drive up costs and margins while driving down competition.  Some of the best dental service I've ever gotten has been in Mexico.  It was a real shocker to get better service for less cost than in the states.
Nice defeatist attitude.
Here ya go: http://www.darylscience.com/Demos/CDSpectroscope.html
.."it makes no difference"...  I don't think that's the case.  Being a natural product and all, (so I hear) there's a great variation in tastes with the higher end stuff ultimately being more rewarding in that aspect as well. Just one way in which it may make a (an admittedly small) difference to those who actually smoke marijuana.
Mmm, they get offered to anyone who can take 'em, around here. I think all the highschools offer them, and the school normally pays your exam fees too.
modding you up since your nick rhymes so well with the comment :)  (however you need to rethink what you said: potential is one thing first hand experience is another)
And it is reddit users, not redditors...
Well, you see.  Profits measured in dollars are up.  In fact, profits measured with the official government inflation adjusted dollars are ok too, but real profits measured in any other commodity or precious metal have gone to hell.  It's all a big fat lie hidden by printed up money.
That DNS point is wrong. Adjust the TTL for the DNS records to a very low value, and use a server like djbdns and you can set the records to switch at a specific time as specified in TAI format.   
What about folks in 50Hz countries?  Seems like they would see worse flicker. * Oh, and remember the bulb flickers at 120Hz, not 60 Hz. So you can't directly compare it to the monitor flicker.  This is because it turns on for both positive and negative peaks of the AC sinewave.
Of course it is. Do you really think anyone can imitate me?
You might laugh, but quite a few nouns starting with al- actually come from the Arabian language: Algebra, alcohol, almanac, alkali, algorithm
&gt; 2) Different grade of fuel   Different _types_ of fuel. Gasoline is much more volatile than Jet A (kerosene). Gasoline burns much hotter than Jet fuel in open air. This is why you don't use gasoline to start your barbecue pit. You would get a 12'+ fireball and need skin grafts. 
Bad title, great link.
Heh. I was of course referring to the rich. That is, the born rich who are remarkably free from the fear of becoming homeless.
One day you will understand that it is only wealth creation that should be rewarded by money. Currently there is a class of people who reap tremendous rewards from the economy while contributing not only absolutely nothing to it, but actually acting as a type of sand in the gears -- wearing people down, causing stress, creating and supporting blame game, creating and supporting useless, inefficient bureaucracies and so on. There is such a thing as leverage.  When you use leverage you don't create any wealth, but you reap a huge reward from people who do create it (in popular parlance you are said to "leverage those people").  Everyone knows we need good managers, but a good manager is as important as any other link in the chain.  Not 100000000 more important!  Right now, people are not 100% awake to that fact, but they will be soon. That's all that matters. You hate the government?  Why?  Corporate governance is the same as the country governance.  Do you realize this?  There is no difference.  It is absolutely the same down to the politics and bullshit. You hate big government?  Then you should be against big corporate governments.  Having a bazillion shareholders dictate what you will do is the same thing as our political government.  Having 10 layers of executive management is the same BIG AND FAT government you hate.  Don't you see that all governance is the same? Corps are government.  They are political.  Life inside corps is often more akin to life in ex-USSR than life in some capitalist wet dream people keep talking about.  Top-down decision making.  Redistribution of wealth.  It's all running rampant WITHIN the corp.  Wake up.
lynch him
sorry if I missed it, but am I the only one that thinks this interview question is pretty worthless for judging the coding skills of the candidate?  
Cheney's undisclosed location.
Thanks for posting that link. I had heard the argument that the DoD didn't include combat deaths occurring in hospitals outside Iraq in their totals, but I never had time to sit down and verify that claim. I always get this warm fuzzy feeling when the common wisdom is debunked, even on a topic as brutal as Iraq.
it's 70 and gorgeous today.  turn a couple of fans on until late may comes around.  then it is boxers all day with the ac on full blast and a fan steadied straight up my crotch.
They needed a study to come to that conclusion?  Just go to any big city with a sizable Gay and Lesbian population and you can see a ton of fat Lesbians.  What next a new study showing Gay men obsessed with their bodies and living at the gym?
Oh, I believe him.  We don't torture, if you redefine it not to include sleep depravation and outsource the harsher stuff to other contries.
Definitely a big improvement, that bowtie was so f'ing pretentious.
It's so tempting to break out my 1337 5p33k lexicon, but I will restrain my self.
I can't believe some rabbi cock sucker modded you down. I modded you up though.
We, of the new Reddit delegation, regretfully rejects your proposal.
Boobah, what the hell....
More of the lesbians I know are the trimmer and/or buff variety.
I've been commuting happily on my Trek 7100 hybrid bike. I would recommend it.
i enjoy this post too bad the domain is offline :(
Don't you think if a Cheney-operative were responsible for the document it would be flawless? You fu**ing lemmings are so blinded by Bush Hatred Syndrome that you can't see that the French are the ones that pulled this stunt. The document was DESIGNED to appear a forgery. The CIA and White House NEVER sighted the forged memo as evidence of the attempt by Saddam to purchase Uranium from Niger. They sight the former Prime Minister of Niger who STILL CLAIMS Saddam's operatives attempted to buy Uranium. I would LOVE to see the evidence of what this story claims. But I won't hold my breath.
Present scholarly opinion is that it's considered proper to capitalize his name:  E. E. Cummings. http://www.gvsu.edu/english/cummings/caps.htm  (From an issue of Spring, the journal of the E. E. Cummings society.)
You mean [E. E. Cummings](http://www.gvsu.edu/english/cummings/caps.htm)?
Or save energy by turning off the damn thing.  Or save even more energy by not foisting pathetic little snippets of the bleeding obvious on the rest of us.
Indicating that members of AL Qaeda are were in Iraq before the invasion is not the same as trying to tie to Saddam to 9/11. But the 2 or 3 reasonable readers on Reddit already figured that out.
Since my 50th birthday was the week before last (woo hoo!), I might qualify as "elder." I'm not sure why you were modded down. Below is what Merriam-Webster has to say about the word "redditor": "The word you've entered isn't in the dictionary. Click on a spelling suggestion below or try again using the search bar above. Suggestions for redditor: \t 1. radiator  \t 2. radiators  \t 3. reedited  \t 4. ready room  \t 5. radiated  \t 6. red rust  \t 7. radio star  \t 8. ready-to-wear  \t 9. radio-tag  \t10. retinoid" Perhaps they meant "elder radiators."
So this website, along with the one for the article with the google-warning stuff in it are down. How sad.
Hey, I don't know if you've noticed [this article on the oil market](http://www.atimes.com/atimes/Central_Asia/HK23Ag01.html): &gt; The term "neo-mercantilist" refers to the economic strategy and ideology pursued by the European colonial powers, wherein the natural resources and other wealth of the colonies that had been established by each colonial empire were rigidly dedicated exclusively to the sustenance of the mother empire.  &gt; In application to India, China and the other rising powers of the East, the term refers to the somewhat comparable strategy of concluding rigid, private bilateral long-term supply contracts between themselves individually and producers they each target around the globe. This has the net effect of securing oil and gas exclusively for the individual consumer state at the expense of the liquidity of the global oil market, and hence at the expense of oil's fungibility.
Hijacking 'open-source' is exactly what OSI did.  Open-source existed long before OSI.
BitMover: An example of why you should not rely on products from a company in which the CEO is actively engaged in flame wars with you. Garden Street Garage: An example of why you should have a laywer read your contract before purchasing a multi-million dollar custom software package. I fail to see how either of these relates to the pseduo-morality that plagues our industry and turns technical debates in a mockery of religious strife.
Cheesemaking
&gt;compassion in work depresses salary.   Where do medical doctors fit in?  It kind of seems like they need lots of compassion *and* are paid well.
I agree. If energy waste is the heart of this issue, then raise electricity prices. If people want to pay for the privilege of warm, pleasant, incandescent light, they should have that option. For people who don't like the bluish, sterile glow of CFLs, maybe they can find other ways to trim their usage, such as investing in other higher-efficiency appliances, or turning them off when not in use. (Why am I being voted down? If people think CFLs suck, then obviously they do, and their advantage—operation cost—needs to be amplified by raising the price of electricity. Doesn't that make sense?)
Yes, that's entirely possible. There was a lot of steel at the site and a lot of air. You do realize that when you add a lot of o2 to a fire it gets really hot, at least for a section of the mass. Also there is a lot of friction created from a fall.
A nice Rapidshare , megaupload search engine
I converted entirely to CFL's over 14 years ago.  I've yet to break a single bulb and every one that's burnt out has been recycled safely. Even if you dump them in the trash its about 2-5 times less Hg in the environment then the coal burnt to power comparable ILBs emits.  LEDs are still much more expensive, and are only beginning to approach CFLs in terms of efficiency for consumer available products. 
Michelle Malkin get's some of the most explicit threats on the internet and still she blogs. I guess some people are just made of stronger material.
So, instead of having a mass group of people who up/down vote or digg/bury we get CmdrTaco and his ususal gang of idiots who can't keep duplicates off the front page? Slashdot was great when it was the only game in town. I used to visit the website and bother keeping logged in, but it's been months since I've posted there that I de-bookmarked them.
I thought the only force out at Apple was from Sculley forcing out Jobs in '85.  Woz technically left Apple in '87, but for all intents and purposes he didn't really have much to do with the company after his plane crash in '81.
His job was to provide accurate intelligence, not to cave into what Cheney demanded and cook the books.
...and that's when all the new users cleaned up their act.  Ahhh, idealism.
If you are looking for a great place to walk, head to the former Lowry Air Force Base and head to the top of the Westerly Creek Dam. You won't be disappointed.
In my area not only are they approximately the same cost, but the farmers markets have crap quality for produce. I can get things at Publix for the same cost that's ten times better quality, even if I hit the FM when they open and lay out their "fresh" stuff.
Righ-wing hawks may believe "the enemy of my enemy is my friend", but most liberals and progressives do not.
Well that's 'cos you're dirt poor. Also, your dogs aren't going extinct.
fuck off
Sounds like the beating victim taunted the girl, giving her his address and daring her husband to come over and do something about it.  Sounds like natural selection at work to me.
This sounds like fun. I wish we had such large events when I was 15.
What a bunch of FUD.  Most doctors have nothing at all to say about the merits of CFLs.  Know what's hard on your eyes?  Spending 8+ hours a day staring into an electron gun, or a brightly lit LCD panel.  How about you give it a rest? 
https://www.goodstorm.com/item/packetloss
So many ways to read that... and they're all quite amusing.
The article talks about retreating arctic ice, so why should it mention methane? Anyway, methane emissions are [largely man made](http://www.epa.gov/methane/sources.html) as well. And methane is included in the [climate models](http://www.realclimate.org/index.php/archives/2006/10/attribution-of-20th-century-climate-change-to-cosub2sub/). [Plants are not to blame](http://science.reddit.com/info/1mbsq/comments). 
he's a convert, well educated and Arabic speaking, and far saner than elected officials - put the TV on instead, it isn't like mutual understanding is possible without your consent to try...
The default ordering is also important. Reddit sorts comments by "Hot" by default (whatever that means), instead of just by age, so if you make a bad comment, it's less likely to be viewed, as it'll soon be at the bottom of the page.
I guess the whole "MC Rove" sketch didn't go over so well for them either.
Majority Of Americans Fail To Realize That It Is They Who Must Take Action To Stop Global Warming
&gt; Power plants are a different issue. Damn right they are.  You see they cost hundreds of millions of dollars or more and are expected to have a useful life of at least 40 years.  Where as lightbulbs get turned over every few months to few years.  So which technology is amenable to a fix _today_, right now? 
always starts with a prayer - how much in a rush are you?
What really sucks is that we're seeing people who write for a living spelling "knew" as "new". 
Experience can be overrated too if that's what you mean.  For example, I've seen folks who are not stupid and have years of experience but have reached a low level of technical understanding in their field.  I've also seen folks with no experience overtake folks with years of technical experience in a very sort period of time.  The major diff in these two kinds of people is that the person with potential generally seems to enjoy what they are doing or enjoys learning it. 
Perhaps it was the misuse of the contraction "it is".
Does anyone know if this is the same voice as the "End of the World" Flash?
They aren't going to watch cable for a month?  Whats the point.  I try to live simply myself, but this list seems like a monthlong self-punishment ritual rather than a well-thought-out plan to save money and lead an economical lifestyle.
The reason we can't have nice things: "It's just a $nameOfNiceThing, people."
If it's such a crappy technology, why does it have such huge adoption rates in countries with sane consumer policies?
Proper grammar is for nancies. If you use good punctuation and spelling, you're automatically gay, whether you're sexually attracted to members of your own sex or not.  At least nobody is abusing their secret font privileges. Or maybe they just don't understand the font system.
Would be very interested.
I'm sure you must be making some kind of ironic inside joke, but I'm not getting it.
Hi, I'm Joe. You must be the Man.  ;)
I don't get it. Is it made of paper or any other material? No trash near? Shadow points to 4:20?
The National Association of Science Writers has written a letter to protest an outrageously high fee for reporters to attend an international medical conference on influenza. Reporters are typically not charged admission fees when they're reporting on medical or scientific conferences.
BS on the story. If he was stalking and repeatedly killing the other player, that would suggest that they're of opposite factions on a PvP server.  The story claims that the guy told her where he lived - there's no plausable way to do that in-game on a PvP server since he couldn't just roll a character on the other faction to tell her this unless he had access to another account that didn't already have characters on his own faction on it. Not only that but the story contains grammatical errors - I know my grammar isn't the best, but it adds to the suspicion. ("I NEW that I might be messed...") All seems highly unlikely to me.   
Dictionaries *describe* language use; they do not *prescribe* it. Since there is generally a several-year lag between editions of a dictionary, it is not surprising that you did not find "redditor" in your dictionary search.
The White House, in fact, did not link Saddam to the act of 9/11.  This was discussed in [this thread](http://reddit.com/info/43qt/comments/c441l), in particular [this post](http://reddit.com/info/43qt/comments/c461s). Edit: To read the deleted comments of the person I was talking to: http://web.archive.org/web/20060423180045/http://reddit.com/info/43qt/comments
Fuck it, I'm gonna start downmodding all this Mike Gravel spam. Starting with this one.
The term Open Source was meant to encompass open development efforts, not social agendas. Unfortunately zealots in our community hijacked the term to use in the same sort of confrontational manner that the originators of the term were trying to avoid. &gt; We realized it was time to dump the confrontational attitude that has been associated with "free software" in the past and sell the idea strictly on the same pragmatic, business-case grounds that motivated Netscape. We brainstormed about tactics and a new label. "Open source," contributed by Chris Peterson, was the best thing we came up with. http://web.archive.org/web/20060423094752/http://www.opensource.org/docs/history.php 
Proof that reddit is too popular.  We'll call it the digg effect.  Any interesting and well ran social voting site will eventually grow so large that the earlier users are no longer interested in the less focused, more popular, more mass market  content.
What's the alternative? That we arbitrarily limit who can and can't freely access the judicial system?  Placing barriers between regular people and civil remedies only weakens the system.
Every high rise fire has not fallen. I do not believe I have seen any. Look at the high rises in Philly and Madrid a few years ago. They did not fall and they burned for days.
This article is ridiculous, down to the absurdly bad photoshop as the main picture. Who ever thought making easily destructible, super expensive medians would be a good idea? Maybe this will be practical in 200 years when the technology improves 18-20 orders of magnitude.
Nor is a comma necessary after "capitalization". However, opinions are mixed among grammarians so I'm willing to let it go.
&gt; And its reddit users, not redditors... Lies!!
The one thing that consistantly interests me about RPGs is how people act, because it reflects something about the real them.  You get some really interesting insights into people when you watch how they play.  And of course, seeing a Horde player Taunting someone till they angry enough to fight, and an Alliance player go 3 on 1 in real life . . . well, you knew that was coming if you watched them in game.
This is totally awesome.  A fantastic tribute to a fantastic trillogy.
perhaps the elder reddits are aging, whining old folks.
I think they'd quickly run out of business.
&gt; The conferees decided it was time to dump the moralizing and confrontational attitude that had been associated with "free software" in the past and sell the idea strictly on the same pragmatic, business-case grounds that had motivated Netscape. They brainstormed about tactics and a new label. "Open source", contributed by Chris Peterson, was the best thing they came up with. http://www.opensource.org/history Would you say OSI has forgotten its own origins or that others were the ones to corrupt its original vision? 
Since this appears to be a thread full of nitpicking grammatical corrections, I may as well point out that you've incorrectly used the possessive pronoun form "its". \*ducks to avoid flying corrections\*
So what are you doing here?
Yeah, but in this case I can see the point they are making. When I was in school, the College Republicans and a conservative student run newspaper would auction off a gun every year or semester (including an assault rifle after the ban ended). I don't know what the purpose of that was, because when I heard about it, my only thought was, "You can give people guns at an auction? Um...maybe we need stricter gun laws..." which couldn't have been the purpose. On the other hand, the newspaper (http://illiniobo.com/) is sometimes so over the edge it reads like satire, so I don't know what to think.
&gt; But only in the headlines, not in comments. Tsk, tsk, you've gone and fragmented your sentence - not to mention leading with a conjunction, but I'll look the other way on that one... :)
No, but they can be launched from huge airbases that can be neutralized with a steady barrage of conventionally-armed ballistic missiles.
We're doing more than most to help curb our carbon footprint.
I'm even scared to think what would happen if she gave you a hand job.
Sorry, I was thinking of Body Fat Percentage as measured by those machines - not BMI. As a SFan, my experience is that in a city of relatively normal weight people (compared to the rest of America), lesbians seem to have more than their share of really fat (55 gallon drum size or larger) women. But then you see alot of things in SF that are not so believable without documentation - like when I went one afternoon to Hambuger Mary's and wondered if it violated the SF health laws for the [male] bartender to be going commando in assless chaps.  :)
I don't think "redditor" will be found in any mainstream dictionary anytime soon if ever.
Who said I was for corporate governments? Now you're guilty of making the same false assumptions you accused me of making. Furthermore, the article in question is talking about taxation of the rich (by The Government) as a means of redistribution of wealth, so that is what I am talking about.  I said I was for reforms aimed at reforming the system rather than the simplistic 'catch-all' of income redistribution. The difference between corporate governance and The Government is that taxation is mandated by law, and forced at gunpoint.  You can leave a corporation if you want.  Even start your own business.  The problem is that our education system creates a paradigm of servitude towards business. You rant against leverage, but leverage is available to the common man.  The problem? He's never heard of it.  Why? Because nobody thought it was important enough to fill him in on it at an early age. Taxation by The Government as THE ARTICLE in question describes only further enslaves the poor by creating a dependency.  The masses have the power effect change by taking an active role in creating corporations where a more equitable distribution of income exists, but they don't because we're taught from day one to become employees, not employers. 
= 1 terawatt hour = 609,311 [barrels of crude oil](http://www.physics.uci.edu/~silverma/units.html) = 136,486 [tons of coal](http://www.physics.uci.edu/~silverma/units.html) = 861,244 [tons of TNT](http://www.unc.edu/~rowlett/units/dictK.html) = 02h:08m:06s of [average U.S. consumption](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_countries_by_electricity_consumption) 
Different places on the internet are different.
Yeah, they're not great for looking at artwork (especially if you're used to full-spectrum bulbs). That said, the energy savings alone make them great for just about any other use. I've got several right now interspersed among a couple of incandescents, and my only minor complaint is that they're not quite as bright as the old incandescent bulbs. As for the color tone and supposed flickering, I haven't had any problems at all so far.
That's pretty sexist.
Do you remember right before the towers fell? There was black smoke coming out of the buildings. Meaning the fire was almost out.
Denied.
Already did.
No, coltech, I think that most professional editors would put a comma there, as "new Redditors" is a vocative (i.e. the name of someone or some people being addressed), and vocatives require commas.   
Mike Gravel getting elected?
Hypocrisy Alert: * If you haven't read L. Ron Hubbard, don't make any snide comments about the book. * If you're not an atheist, don't make any snide comments about Mormonism.
Entirely true - many people completly ignore the issues, and every little bit helps. But the assertion that you're "doing your part" because of a small token effort is almost as damaging in the long term as doing nothing
I think you can write it off as a typo.
Also, corps camping is one thing, but to get the same person day after day is nearly impossible. To do that you need a grid of spy/collaborators surveying the other faction for you.
Many of Slashdot's douchebags migrated to Reddit, unfortunately.
yes - what I meant was   "there's no need to be surprised that they hired Justin without Linux exp. for a job coding for a large Linux farm. He  could very well be the like the second example person Zera_Holladay will mention in the next reply to my comment."   
I think that at $200 million a pop, the Air Force will be telling F-22 pilots to avoid mixing it up at close range.  Helmet-mounted missile sighting systems have changed everything.
*insert obligatory darwin awards reference here*
Get farked yew owld peeple wee downt nead yaw creeetisism.
Oh I dunno... it's pretty easy to provide examples for that logic. Less children would mean smaller classes, which would mean more personal attention to the varying educational needs of the individual children (if you consider education to be part of rearing). However, my original point, in response to... &gt;"raising kids isn't useful" was that we have *too many people*.  Overpopulation is a bane to nearly all measures of the welfare of a society.  So, no... one person raising children is not specifically any more useful to the world than that person not having a child at all. If ya want to have kids, that's cool... I hope to some day.  But know that you're doing it because you want to, and don't expect to be treated like you're offering some great service to the community.  For all we know, that kid could grow up to be a violent drain on society, despite a perfectly fine childhood. I make an exception for those who rear kids they didn't make... that *is* actually providing a service for society, if only because it keeps the kids out of state-run institutions. I hoped to avoid saying all that by ending with a smiley face... mission failed.
I'm an American, why is Knob offensive?  I think of doorknobs or bedknobs, both of which do not offend me.
It will be... if I write in myself... *IN CRAYON!* {{{scribble scribble}}}
Not only am I a well-read atheist, I'm a hypocritical well-read atheist.
Actually, that was a movie.  A documentary style movie.  Theres no need to hype stuff, just say what it actually is and if it's cool like this was, people will rate it so.
this is by far the lamest post and comment section i've ever seen.  so, ironically, i'm contributing to it.  way to go me. as for proper grammar, capitalization, and spelling...  if i get my point across then it's mission accomplished, fuck formalities, grow up, adapt, learn to use your intelligence instead of your knowledge of rules that have been standardized decades ago by people you don't even know if you should trust.
&gt; Why is child care, which certainly has value and which is overwhelmingly performed by women, almost always uncompensated?  Huh?  Do you think that a working man (or woman) never gives any money to his (or her) stay at home spouse? Do we not have welfare for women without husbands to pay their way? 
Sure it is. Haven't you heard of welfare?
In many places even inside the US, "street gangs" are those that work on the roads, not the ones that beat you up and take your milk money.
Link?
DONE AND DONE! {{{bleeds softly with his song}}}
&gt; intoxicated [perhaps](http://reddit.com/info/1j89k/comments/c1j8f9) [possibly](http://reddit.com/info/1gcsx/comments/c1gim9)
The US, starting with Carter in the '70's (Iran Hostage crisis), then Reagan in the '80's (Iran Hostage Crisis, Libya, Beirut, Armed oil-tanker escort in the Persian Gulf), then Bush I, (Gulf War), then Clinton (missiles all over the place, Somalia, no-fly zone in Iraq, etc.) has long had a policy of military intervention in the Middle East that is directly related to our belief that it is the best way to maintain stability in the region, which is crucial to us because of its oil.  That in combination with the neocon conviction that the best way to maintain US interests in the world is through not just military strength, but military supremacy, got us into our current clusterfuck.  There were other things going on as well, but those were the basic foundations and in that sense it is not at all inaccurate to say that our military intervention in the Middle East really is about oil.   Which is not to say that the neocons didn't actually believe, astounding as it seems, that they could set up a Western style liberal democracy in Iraq and that it would somehow catalyze a democratic revolution throughout the Middle East.  They did.  They are just that stupid.  But even that is still basically at root about oil.  You don't see us invading dictatorships in Sub-Saharan Africa and attempting to set up a viable democracy for the very good reason that in terms of strategic resources, Sub-Saharan Africa is not critical to us.  (Although we might launch a minor operation if we felt that the Nigerian oil-fields were threatened.)
Do you even bother reading the OSI history page?
Technically, "grammar" encompasses both capitalization and spelling. REDUNDANT!
And that a good portion of the middle is not on board with impeachment.
if you use proper grammar in comments, but fail to make a valid, well-supported point, then I doubt any number of grammar apologists will save you. using proper grammar and making well-supported points without talking down to others is always appreciated.
Is this some kind of late April Fools joke?
&gt; But then, doing the exact opposite of what the herd is doing is usually a successful strategy. When are you going to drive into a pole, shoot yourself in the head, or try to live without food or water for a year? Blindly doing the opposite of what everyone else is doing is hardly a better idea, in most cases, than blindly doing what everyone else is doing.
Me too... :)  I have recently noticed a lot of anti-Scientology and anti-Mormonism comments on Reddit... most probably from mainstream Christians.  It's really quite silly that they think there is any difference between their superstitions and Mormonism and Scientology...
Not to mention that being male already makes one a minority ([0.967 males per female](https://www.cia.gov/cia/publications/factbook/geos/us.html#People)) but when you include "white" as a criteria the number goes way down. Continuing with numbers from the same source, blacks are about 13% of the population and Hispanics are now a larger minority so assume they are 14%.  Add 5% for Asians, Indians, etc. and only 68% of the population is white. That makes white males about 33% of the population which is a minority by any unbiased person's definition.  Claiming otherwise is bigotry. What people ought to do is base scholarships purely on need and ability but then the various bigots who support the current system might accidentally find some of their money benefiting a a white boy from Appalachia and they would stroke out.
There must be some leet hackers here that could make those giant ad screens in new york display gravel and play some of his speeches ? Talk about how hackers can control the world.
I concur. There has been an abundance of abysmal spelling which would be resolved with a simple spell check, yes? Proper grammar would also be much appreciated. Yes, yes. Now, have the boy pull 'round a carriage. I care to travel to the market.
Holy crap, I am going to link to this from my facebook.
Apparently there is a redditor religion because people seem pissed! I am sorry, I too believe in redditors.
Who were you listening to?  From memory, there was plenty of opposition outside the US. The UN and Free world was so much in support that Bush went into Iraq with only  the UK , Australia and Poland in support. Does the free world include Europe? I seem to remember France being pilloried round that time for not falling for the lies. I don't remember huge commitments from anyone else in Europe either.  Iraq has been a hot-spot for decades, with ongoing conflicts between Shi'a, Sunni, and Kurd. Most of Saddams reputation for ruthlessnes came from his suppression of his own people. Once that cap was released, it should have surprised no-one that everything boiled over, pretty much instantaneously.
That's great, Digg can't hold it's own.
whatup
Have you ever tried to get a device patent before??
when does it end?
You trying to imply something about the size of my rectum?
bull 
dis be a tuff 'ssignment.  i's understandin' the nature of da problem  wh'n it cum he to real 'pawunt stuff like callin' da prezdit a Gimpy Poof, but uddewise, If one is able to have the intricacies of structure and grammar and they have displayed such, then let it be.   I have come to find that the new deacons of correctness in the bloom of web2.o are ever so stuffy and plain vanilla in their dictates and doctrinaire ways.   I myself will not abide ignorance and faulty constructs that are not . . .  oh let's say crafted.   I find however that coming to reside on many new sites is like moving into a coop, a gated deed restricted community or an stiff necked condo.   Loosen up or tighten up.  Mod if you will, but mod with some finesse and humor.  Please don't be Calvanist in your moditoring.   Thank you and send me money on Obo.
i just want to hear tunes dude 
E. E. Cummings mastered the English language before he started messing with it.
[you tell me](http://reddit.com/info/1m2a2/comments/c1m4ny) 
&gt; otter pops. hmm. i like them. Kill people who like *Otter Pops*!  Kill the *Bloo Tongues*! &gt; pretarded hysterical sheeptards The ironic part, this phrase appeals to *cc* precisely because of his missing chromosomes (and panic attacks)
The dentists.
Because now they're attempting to suppress the dissemination of the key, which is causing a Streisand effect. http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Streisand_effect
I support potsmokers, they lower the bar for the rest of us.
Total bullshit.  I can't believe anyone actually thinks that.  The reason the US has self-appointed itself as the world's police-force has everything to do with the projection of military power and absolutely nothing to do with ideology.  You are correct that many countries benefit because of US military hegemony, but you are delusional if you think we do it out of altruism.  We do it because we know for a fact that our long-term strategic and economic interests are best served by relatively open Western-style liberal democracies with whom we can develop mutually beneficial trade relationships.  You are a dupe of the worst sort if you think otherwise.
Not having keys inside to _change your mind_ with, is bad all by itself.
I can't read his words, based on the fact that they run off my fucking screen. Sure, I could scroll over, but that's asking too much, of ME. As an American.
Well, cyanide reduces the risk of cancer, but besides that...
A filter is nowhere near as effective as a real lens tilf-shift. Tilting and shifting the lens actually changes the plane of focus. Normal lenses focus from near to far, by changing the angle between the lens and the film you can make a lens focus from top to bottom, or diagonally. You can also control perspective by tilt/shifting, altering the plane of light as it hits the film. This way you can make buildings that normally bulge inward look normal, and keep the lines the same distance apart for infinity (the fundamental basis of architechtiural photography). As mentioned in another comment, you can also use tilt shifting to make nearly everything in focus. By tilting the lens plane downward to point to an imaginary location where the film plane and ground plane intersect, the entire ground plane can be made in focus from the lens to infinity, but the focus falls of vertically rather than through the frame (so you could have the entire ground in focus, as long as everything in the picture was no taller than about eight inches, where it would start to blur, or course using a higher f-stop would allow for greater flexibility here).
I would have modded you up if you'd capitalized your sentences.
good site 
Hi bobcat.. sorry if it was my recent post that provoked this. It's just that i simply can't keep track of all the language rules: is 09f911029d74e35bd84156c5635688c0 supposed to be capitalized? And should i have added hyphens, like 09-F9-11-02-9D-74-E3-5B-D8-41-56-C5-63-56-88-C0? Or is it better to indent it in a blockquote, like this? &gt; 09F91102 &gt; 9D74E35B &gt; D84156C5 &gt; 635688C0  
I may just be a stick in the mud, but I really hate the miniaturizing tilt-shift effect. Especially since a year or so back when I notice National Geographic was using it in their coverage of post-Katrina New Orleans. I can't say I'm against all photo manipulation, but I am against unspoken manipulation of any photo that one would normally expect to have factual integrity (i.e. most photos other than in advertising or artistic works). I've thought about starting a movement to encourage standards among digital photographers establishing how we can indicate to each other how our photos have been edited. E.g. a series of graphical icons similar to the ones Flickr uses to indicate usage licenses, except in this case they would indicate whether the photographer had 1) edited the brightness/contrast of the photo as a whole, 2) spot-altered brightness/contrast, 3) removed blemishes from portrait subjects, 4) cropped or stretched the image, 5) removed irrelevant but distracting objects, etc. etc. etc. I know I'm obsessive, but I hate looking at a photo and not having any idea as to what the original(s) looked like.
"redditite"?  Is that an extraterrestrial mineral that destroys the powers of Digg users?
I think that falls under "killing in self-defense"
Actually, darling, it's a pop culture reference. As in, did she really just go there? Oh, my gosh, he totally goes there. Et cetera.
What's hypocritical about pointing out that his favorite book is written by a cult founder, while he himself believes in magical aliens hiding behind comets? Seems to be pretty much in tune. In fact, I wouldn't be surprised if some associations between LDS and scientology will come out some day. They're kinda similiar in their belief in alien deities.
That's an apples-and-oranges comparison.  The Republicans and Democrats in Congress can become friends if they like, or enemies if they like - it's internal to Congress.  But regardless, they and the other two branches should not become too friendly with each other.  Similarly, the press play the fourth role.
Because C++ is portable.  So are web development skills and programming in general.
Nice recursion
In America, you would be considered white, no question about it.  This isn't 1920 and distinctions between Wasps and other whites aren't as important as they used to be.
Wow... this is really technical.
Is there any reason why they couldn't be impeached simultaneously?
Isn't that what that big red "STOP" button is for?
&gt;I believe in the importance of nurture. If men were raised better, they would be socially and emotionally healthier, and friendlier. Isn't that a logical assertion? Except, you talk about the need to mentor college students.  They're adults, otterplay, and once you're an adult, you're responsible for your words and actions.  You don't get to blame your upbringing, and shame on you for shifting the burden of responsibility off of adult men for their own behavior.
Germany and Japan lost a war they declared on the US, which is why there are US bases there. Where is the idealism there? Korea was split in two after WWII, creating the conditions that triggered the war there. The US was concerned that this might be the domino that caused all of Asia to adopt Communism, so stepped in to prevent that. I suppose you could call that "idealism" if you like, but to me its much more about strategically limiting your current enemies power. The simple fact of the matter is that if Iraq had no oil, the US wouldn't be there.
This action isn't abnormal - it's an exercise of the police power of the state. Licensing is the government's "stamp of quality". It raises the bar so that uninformed parties (Joe Sixpack) can be reasonably assured a standard level of care. It does raise costs substantially. Insurance companies do not deal with unlicensed practitioners. Basically, in order to be legal, you have to go with the system. The fact that this man was jailed does not surprise me. He made good money until people stopped him at his game. The authorities intervened for the "welfare of the public" Yes, it sucks to hear this, but health care does not operate in a free market environment.
 Fact: text without proper capitalization and punctuation takes longer to read due to the required mental "corrections". What you call "formalities", I call "protocols for efficient communication". Furthermore, i'm in ur comment dissin ur letterz. 
Capturing the image of the screen using C#
Lua. Minimalistic, pleasant syntax, active community, plenty of libraries - including some pretty good GUI stuff.   Domain specific languages are where it is all at though. If I was doing anything statistics related, I would use the R programming language. If I want a simple quick dirty web-application, PHP.  For some injustices:  *  Ruby has an ugly syntax, nice semantics, and the interpreter could be better.   *  Python is great - to the point of being a little boring. *  Lisp and Scheme are *not* good for anything with heavy string-manipulation, database access, or GUI.   *  Forth is great in some obscure and rarely encountered situations.   *  Haskell is impressive, but I still don't understand monads.   *  Obscure academic languages are generally pretty useless, as a high quality well supported set of libraries is essential to any programming language. Given that Haskell appears to be very popular, can anyone explain to me the disconnect between its popularity, and the amount of useful applications written in it? Edit: I can actually find quite a few useful applications written in Haskell.
Bring it on. Tell me in one word (or letter) or in whole pages. I want objective comparisons, name calling, and downright injustices. I need to know and I don't need the karma.
http://www.grammarbook.com/punctuation/capital.asp
What nosoupforyou meant was that Blizzards policy is that this is not abuse as they define it.
We already found the way: educate women.
Being a country boy and unaccustomed to elevators, I actually once made the embarrassing mistake of pressing the STOP button when I wanted to ... STOP. It did stop. For good. Until the repairman came to release me an hour or two later.
up voted by a cranky oLd Fart who doesn't like grammar Nazis.
He's a smart guy.
Well, if you actually read the article, you'd see that they were saying that it is unlikely that these lesbians would have a high muscle mass "while having low body fat". They were just saying that these obesity rates aren't attributable to being jacked. (And by the way, we're all impressed by how "well built" you are). And was your point on "better body image" vs "more positive body image" really necessary? No, it wasn't.
If you don't care enough about your message to convey it properly, why should other people even bother to try to understand?
Why is that an oops?  A lot of the people who opposed affirmative action weren't trying to benefit their tribe - they just thought it was wrong.   Whites who are honestly bested by Chinese kids probably don't feel cheated, as they do when they lose because of discrimination.
I'd do a lot of stuff about it, but I can't be bothered.
A *lot* of people have two accounts and play them on separate machines at the same time (a work laptop and a home desktop, for example), just to get around things like this, and provide other benefits.  It's called dual-boxing.
We've had this discussion here several times. Why do you want to know what other people's favorite languages are anyway?
I really don't see buying a new Prius and using 100% CF bulbs as *a small effort*. While we do see a lot of Prii on the road, we don't know anyone else who has one. Most people don't know that the Prius, while getting excellent gas milage (we've enjoyed 44mpg over 4,000 miles of driving), it is also a partial-zero emissions vehicle. It releases merely a fraction of the emissions that normal cars do. We also take the bus to work, which is another good thing. So unless you are doing more than we are, at least we're making an effort. What are you doing above and beyond us?
Nuclear fission reactions?  I think you mean nuclear fusion.  Fusion reactions require extremely hot temperatures.  Fission reactions can happen at room temperature.
The "purity" of Ruby and the "evils" of Microsoft? Why is there so much zealotry here?
*Democrats* (as the article says) don't consider Clinton a liberal. Republicans probably think so because she's the one their pundits are most fond of attacking.
Using/developing for MS software forces one to give up their ethics and morality? What bullshit. Good programmers write software that runs on all platforms, including Windows.
For many tasks, Reiser4 really murders the competition! Thanks, I'll be here all week.
C.
He lost me when he said all produce will be bought at a farmer's market. Hey, I shop at one too, but they are the antithesis of "frugal shopping." They're far pricier because of the typically smaller scale farming and higher wages.
I think you are right about the subjective difficulty of Haskell, but Erlang is a functional language, and it is one of the simplest languages I've ever used. Functional languages don't have to be difficult; Haskell is difficult because it is so deep rooted in some pretty complex mathematical stuff.
Hey buddy, puff puff pass. Something that makes you this immune to the bounds of logic must be good shit.
Wow, no water for +2 hours and over 20 miles? That sounds a bit scary to me... I'm horribly out of shape admittedly, but I just recently got a bike and started to get some exercise. Just today, I did a 10 mile trip in... 2 hours. The terrain was pretty hilly, so I had to go pretty slow. But in that time, I downed FOUR bottles of water. I got about 5 miles in, completely emptied the two bottles of water I was carrying, and got an additional two bottles on the way.
There is nothing informative in the article.  "Eat healthy, and try to learn things"   Not really worth reading.
But at least he didn't have sex with his intern
Thanks one and all for confirming for me that the new bulbs aren't worth the risk for the benefit. negatives... * women don't like them (!) * crappy color * flicker * steep up front charge * dimmer than incandescents * can't be used with dimmers * don't last as long as expected * not surge resistant * has warm-up time   What about heavier, therefore costs more to transport, expending more fuel?  
*You* clearly do *not* reason.
This is disgustingly anti-gay.  I had hoped for enlightened comments.  Instead there's stuff like, it's not normal, so we shouldn't teach that it's OK.  Who are you to determine normal?  And who says normal is right?  What's wrong with the abnormal?   
Obscure academic languages sometimes have good libraries too.
i think i'll still be able to get to sleep tonight, wake up tomorrow and lead a productive life...all without your mod points.  i think...
Interesting. great tips
Why is it that you insist on calling everyone you disagree with an idiot? Are you somehow labouring under the assumption that there are no reasonable grounds for ever disagreeing with you?
Yeah, normally, but I've seen it several times recently. Maybe that just means I'm spending too much time on reddit and digg.
Any examples?
News and gossip about 2008 H-D line-up; links to more info.
touche, nice work on dissin ma letterz
[FairTax FAQ](http://www.fairtax.org/site/PageServer?pagename=about_faq).
I think you're missing the point. We cannot all be running around leveraging each other.  Someone actually has to grow apples and someone has to fix the plumbing. What that means is that people in positions of leverage should remain humble.  But is that what happens?  I don't see it yet. People who leverage others are overcompensated due to our servile and fearful mindset that buys into the importance of business, just as you say.  The solution is NOT for all of us to become businessmen!  That's insanity. We should NOT be all businessmen.  But we should all understand how the power works.  And we should be in touch with our own power.  Then there will no longer be any arrogant and overly selfish super-rich and there won't be anything to complain about.  I say "overly" because I do believe there is a healthy amount of selfishness and an insane amount.  I'll leave it to you to be the judge of where that line is. Corporate hierarchies are corrupted worse than our government.  At least the government has to abide by *some kind of transparency*.  A corporate government is most often strictly top-down and opaque.  A political government has SOME feedback from its constituents.  Not so with the corporate government.  So while the political government may be harder to escape, corporate government compensates for it by being impossible to inspect and correct.  You can choose to leave, but leaving is hardly a feedback with corrective power, since it doesn't affect the top hierarchy that much if the market continues to reward it.  And since the market is not a constituent within the company, it can reward very nasty behaviors without feeling the pain of that nastiness on their own skin, since it's not subject to corporate governance directly.  This is a setup for suffering.
So if you have a gun with which you're prepared to kill an intruder then it's okay for an intruder to shoot you first before burgling your house, right? I mean, fair's fair and "what's good for the goose is good for the gander" right?
Why can't it be redditans?
No, seriously people, this comment makes no sense. Someone explain how this comment makes more sense than someone just randomly yelling YOU PEOPLE WANT WOMEN TO STARVE
Haskell.
Also please try to avoid commenting unless you have something worthwhile to say. It used to be awesome to read through Reddit comments for new ideas or opinions, especially those from people who had special perspectives or were experts on the topic. Clever jokes are also appreciated. Recently, though, it has taken too much effort wading through all the other comments to find these. If you liked an article but not for any particular reason, just upvote it, and vice versa. Similarly, if you agree with somebody, just upvote their comment. If you noticed something that anybody else would have noticed too, you don't need to point it out. As for personal anecdotes proving to yourself that you *are indeed* relevant... I don't mean to set rigid guidelines. It's just that I know you've got meaningful things to say, and I think it's great when you share--when you think it's worth other people's time.
Is this just a pic or is there a video?
&gt;On **May 1, 2003**, President Bush landed on the aircraft carrier USS Abraham Lincoln aboard an S-3B Viking jet, emerged from the aircraft in full flight gear, and proceeded to "press[] flesh," as The Washington Post put it, as he shook hands and hugged crew members in front of the cameras. Later that day, Bush delivered a nationally televised speech from the deck of the Abraham Lincoln in which he declared that "[m]ajor combat operations in Iraq have ended," all the while standing under a banner reading: "Mission Accomplished." http://mediamatters.org/items/200604270005
Extremism is a social phenomenon which war exacerbates. Jesus understood this. Conservatives don't.
Did not know about the extensive, self-coordinated, privately held efforts to search for him...Its hearing about things like these that restore a little of my faith in people.
&gt;He is the only politician I've ever seen, who both understands why the US acts like it does, and tells the American people about it. +1 that he won't be a candidate. Americans do not want their behavior being discussed in public, as they know how disguisting are the lenghts they will do to get (control of) oil. And I am not thinking about Big Oil interests, I am thinking about avg Joe. He wants his oil, no matter injustice and suffering this may bring elsewhere. He fells ahamed, so he prefers this not being discussed.
because i believe that i write well enough to convey my message to the people i want to convey it to.  if you don't want to bother to try to understand it then don't read it, i don't really give a shit.  does all lowercase letters and the random typo really make you not want to bother to try to understand something that someone has written? i'm all for making an attempt to communicate properly, but when people nitpick about capital letters and proper use of commas in rare cases then the shit has gone too far.  odds are that someone, somewhere, will find something grammatically incorrect about every post on here, but it doesn't mean they need to waste their time by saying, "you're comma is in the wrong place".  just read the shit and move on.
By "troll" do you mean someone who makes more sense than you do?
You know, you should have at least mentioned that: &gt; tolerance isn't accepting people with different skin color or sexual orientation; it's accepting people with different ideas. is blatantly false. Tolerance is only accepting people with *morally irrelevant* differences. It isn't "tolerance" to accept psychopathic serial killers, it's stupidity.  Similarly for tolerating republicans who really deserve to have all the policies they advocate inflicted on them. Starting with capital punishment.
Come now, folks.  Things are NEVER as bad (or as good) as they seem. Sheesh.  To think you require the likes of ME to remind you of that particular truth!
http://reddit.com/info/1cd1o/comments/c1ceu8
If it's hexadecimal, it should be in this form: 0xb0bCA7
Just because the book, Battlefield Earth, was written by the founder of Scientology, doesn't mean it has any scientology connection in the text. It's a fairly silly action-adventure space-opera, entertaining enough, but doesn't hold up against *quality* sci-fi. The point is, is that it's a work of fiction, not a religious text.
Ebonicode.
C++ and Python. 
If this came for George Tenet, it can't be trusted. Bill Clinton was George Tenet's professor of prevarication. Mr. Tenet lied in his book just like Clinton lied in his memoir entitled "The Johnson Years." Oh wait, it was "My Lie" or "My Life" or something like that.
Because there's nothing quite like a good ego stroking. Haskell. Why? It makes me feel dumb.
And get off the lawn!
High Frames Per Second IS slow motion.  If you record say 100fps and play it back at 24fps (which is what they're doing here), that means you get slow motion.  So your title should just read "High FPS = ...."   
I don't think the problem is that they'll charge exorbitantly. What I'm saying is that there's usually only one route from point A to point B that is the shortest. Whoever owns that route has a monopoly on the shortest route between A and B. So roads *are* special in that regard. The reason gas stations don't charge $1000 a gallon is because individually, they don't hold a monopoly on gasoline. You only get the benefits of capitalism when competition can occur. And I'd like to go on record as saying that I don't want to live in a place where multiple freeways are built to the same place so that competition can occur. That would be horribly inefficient. It would be like having to choose which power line company you would pay to transport your electricity to you, and each of these firms build their own infrastructure, meaning there's three sets of power lines on the side of every street. &gt;If you assert that capitalists are greedy and profit-driven That is indeed what I'm asserting, however I didn't say anything about bankruptcy. I believe in the benefits of competition. However that can't occur in this case. For government, when they set out to build a road, the end goal is to build a road that moves the most people in the shortest distance and time, usually in accordance with a long term plan that specifies what quantities of people, time and distance are required to satisfy population growth. For private industry, their goal would be to squeeze the most money out of capital, which in this case happens to be a road. Government commissions studies and holds hearings that are open to the public. Their effectiveness changes over time depending on who's in office, but in the end, ostensibly, they work for us. When you're talking about private owners, now you're talking about *their* road, and frankly, who are you to say what they should do with *their* road and their money? You just live nearby and would be using that road. That's what I don't like. In the end government ain't perfect, but tactically you have the ability to give your say.
I was going to upmod you for this: &gt;Tolerance is only accepting people with morally irrelevant differences. It isn't "tolerance" to accept psychopathic serial killers, it's stupidity. but then I saw this: &gt;Similarly for tolerating republicans who really deserve to have all the policies they advocate inflicted on them. Starting with capital punishment. and had to downmod you.   
I modded you up because you bring an opinion to the table. I wholeheartedly disagree, but that's not the point.
No, but at the moment, it appears Bush has plausible undeniably.  And they probably don't have to make that up.
The fact that you can write out a number like that doesn't make it small.  More to the point, it's a pretty slippery slope to claim that "small" numbers are qualitatively different from "large" numbers.
Stunningly bad analogy, RK.  By casting all people of one skin colour in the role of "innocent victim" and all people of another in the role of "violent criminal", you are engaging in the very sort of thinking that led to these sorts of problems in the first place.
He needs to get rid of that girl faster than he wasted that Subaru.  Jesus, that is the most annoying girl of all time.  "I don't want to go fast!" VROOOOOOOOOOOOOOM, SHUT UP BITCH!  LOLZ.
Gimme a break. It's a CARTOON.
heh. ive learned to blink in sync to eliminate the flicker. actually i havent noticed that. the ballast deal teaches you to pause before walking into an unlit room as you flip the switch.
Or maybe Bush Jr. wanted to finish what Bush Sr. started?  Maybe it's a bit more personal? Using Occam's Razor: 1. Neocons had an altruistic motive -- let's improve the situation in the middle east for everyone's sake. OR 2. They had selfish and petty reasons for invading, having more to do with basic human nature than with global altruism. Which is easier to believe? 
Christ, it's mindblowing to think just quite how far it's possible to go with grammar nazism. I consider myself to be a good practitioner of the aforementioned quality, and therefore have left several holes in this very sentence and paragraph, in anticipation of someone more learned than me passing on much yearned for knowledge in this field.
yay maddox
The use of the word "abandoned" carries the unwarranted assumption that they *ever* believed in liberty.   
Yeah, I actually used to enjoy his schtick on Crossfire but his MSNBC show was basically unwatchable the few times I tried.  It was kinda like he wasn't even believing the stuff he was saying.  Maybe he is over the hump now.
Two l8!
Neither, apparently, do you. What reasoning has lead you to believe that doing the opposite of what the herd is doing will normally be successful? At best, I could see the argument that the herd is irrelevant. With your stance, your will is still linked to that of the herd.
and be sure to take a big hit for that outer worldly mercurial buzz. i hear it makes you want to visit a gay hooker or become a religious leader and sometimes both at once.
I don't want this to turn into a pissing contest. You deserve the utmost praise for your efforts, efforts that are indeed, much more than what most people do.  I'm not even criticizing you for not doing enough. Of course anyone can take it one step farther, the question is where you draw the line for you, personally, and feasibly. It's merely the attitude, of "well, I'm doing more than other people, thus I must be doing enough" that I am criticizing.
It's not often I hear nonconformism as an argument for spelling like a dumbass. Bravo, you've hit rock bottom. P.S. When you show complete disregard for capitalization and linguistic propriety, the point you get across is that you're either lazy or incompetent- form and content can't really be separated that easily.
I would have prefered that he said "The Moon is a Harsh Mistress" or "Citizen of the Galaxy" but at least he cited a science-fiction book which is more than we can expect out of any of the other candidates (with the possible, but unlikely, exception of Ron Paul).
I was thinking more along the lines of operating on streams or linked lists, rather than just waiting.
and what a relief im not the only one with a corkscrew penis. ...what do you mean they're talking about ducks...? oh.
Lua does seem to have an incredibly active community. Its blazing fast, simple, flexible...it really could be thought of as a Scheme with more syntax. Main problem with it though is Unicode support...
I'm just saying that obviously money must be shared with a stay-at-home mom, or else she would receive no money, and thus starve to death (which would be a bad thing, obviously). This is at least partly the definition of joint finances, and shows that she is still being paid for her work, although perhaps not enough.
I will never purposefully screw with the English language due to ill will.  However, I do not agree to assiduously follow the rules of the English language either. Basically, old reddittors: screw off.  I mean no harm, but I won't be following your suggestions. 
Patricia O'Conner points out that people have been starting sentences with conjunctions since the 10th century, and I'm tempted to take her word for it.
Several possible factors: 1. Heterosexual women have more motivation to stay thin, since  appearance is more important to males. (A-&gt;B) 2. Obese women have more motivation to be homosexual.(B-&gt;A) 3. Hormonal or neurochemical difference which cause homosexuality in women also promote obesity (X-&gt;A &amp; B)   
&gt;Foot travelers in Amazonic South America wear condoms when wading through water to prevent a small catfish known as candirú from swimming into the urethra. The fish is attracted to the scent of blood and urine. Does that mean hey need o be, err, aroused the entire time they are wading?
It just proves we need more founding!
Good article.  I think you can substitute the relevant roles for "manager" or "programmer".  There's only one thing worse than a team managed by a manager, and that's a team managed by a programmer.   "Every artist needs someone to protect him from himself."
&gt;Regarding your example of food regulation as an essential function of government, I think that an effective marketplace (which allows consumers to choose quality food providers) together with an effective judicial system (which allows injured parties to recover actual and punitive damages from those responsible in the chain of commerce) are a much better protectors of the public's food than government inspections. Good thing that you don't have anything to do with food industry.  Also it seems that you are completely hopeless idealist who comes with long winded explanation on any real world case I bother to dig up. This conversation is fruitless. As someone who works in corporate security and knows a lot of case studies of things gone wrong. Personal responsibility is complete bullshit, without regulations corporate responsibility only makes rich lawyers.  And also without regulations, how you can prove that someone did something wrong in the first place, so there goes responsibility. It is a good thing that there are more sensible people in this society keeping idealist like you safe from those who don't care. I really hope that you some time run into some asshole who really doesn't give a fuck of any responsibility or lawsuits. Nothing too fatal, but hopefully educational. Such as buying a house from some closet alcoholic who has built the house with everything wrong except on the surface so you don't spot anthing. And will not come to court and will disappear so that you don't get any compensation for fixing the house so that it can be lived in. Of course if there would have been mandatory building inspections during constructions, the horrible building quality would have been detected and building stopped. But that would be big brother spying on people.
If by "elder Redditors" you mean pedantic 14-yr.-old asshats, then I fart in your general direction and mod down on principle.
I'm not making any kind of analogy. I'm reducing Detlev's ridiculously idiotic argument into the absurdity it is.
I have not yet been in a position to care about Unicode - I don't look forward to biting the bullet and doing so either. What problems arise when Unicode is mixed with Lua?
I wasn't aware of that definition, although it is in the [OED](http://dictionary.oed.com/cgi/entry/50097652?query_type=word&amp;queryword=grammar&amp;first=1&amp;max_to_show=10&amp;sort_type=alpha&amp;result_place=1&amp;search_id=xfFV-4ejrA2-7290&amp;hilite=50097652).  I would say that it's not part of the commonly-accepted definition of the word. This nevertheless gives me an extra reason to laugh when people complain of bad grammer. That kills me every time.
&gt; does all lowercase letters and the random typo really make you not want to bother to try to understand something that someone has written? YES. Capital letters were made for reasons. Readability is one of them. &gt; when people nitpick about capital letters and proper use of commas in rare cases There's a protocol with which people have agreed upon to communicate, and that's English. When everyone plays along the same rule, we waste no brainpower trying to decipher your message. That's efficiency.
You're saying that there should be a table with a column with a constant value? That seems  bit fishy to me.
maybe you're right, maybe i've hit "rock bottom".  or maybe i just assume that the reading ability of a person of at least average intelligence isn't slowed down by the usage of only lowercase letters and the occasional imperfect usage of punctuation. actually, what i truly think it is, is that i'm just an asshole when it comes to people chastising others for improper grammar. or just an asshole overall. also, if you notice i tend not to misspell, i'm just speaking up for the 'tards that do.
I really doubt that guy is straight.
While the ignorance of this fellow (unless he's joking)is amusing, he probably *is* happier. While high intelligence enables one to do all sorts of neat things, the downside (alienation, stigmatization, etc) is considerable. On the whole, "IQ too high" is just as bad a problem for the person who has it as "IQ too low".
Hey! Good story!  Sure would be cool if that happened in real life.  Any actual sources for this story?
&gt;Given what we know about Muslim treatment of women, I don't think it could be considered racist to ... what you think you know is rascist,  is received knowledge for the most part. I know that because I have the same sources, and also because I once married into islam so I have direct personal experience. If that doesn't trump your post then the goal posts are moving.
That's funny, it's EXACTLY what I've seen in the media.  Then again, my sole experience with lesbianism comes from watching Big Momma's House 2.
Here's something I'm not sure if anyone has touched on yet.  I suspect that one reason men make more money than women is that they are willing to sacrifice their happiness and job satisfaction more than women if it means making some extra money.
(*nay*)
Haskell is a beautiful language that's probably my favorite overall. F# is my favorite language that I'm currently in a position to actually use. It's missing some of the elegance of Haskell, but most of the important concepts transfer, and it interoperates cleanly with our existing C# code base.
A really excellent article!
C, Haskell, Smalltalk, Forth.
If A and NOT A are equally plausible positions, and A is supported by the herd, then NOT A is the more likely to be true. That's because herd support is circular and vacuous. Once it's subtracted from the raw plausibility of A, A becomes strictly less plausible than NOT A. It's simple arithmetic.
So the solution is to force users to wade through a bunch of crap stories if they want to vote on anything?
The opinions aren't really mixed. It's a perfectly legitimate, if unnecessary, Oxford comma.
You need both descriptors. If you just said "high fps," you could mean a video with.. you guessed it.. a high count of frames per second. If you said just "slow motion," you could mean a video which was taken at, say, 30 fps and played at 1 fps. Your statement gives this away- you say yourself "and play it back at 24fps." The speed at which you play it back is sort of important.
&gt;On the other hand, repeatedly ganking someone over and over is a really repulsive thing to do. It's legal in WoW, but seriously still a shitty thing to do. Reroll PVE, scrub.
Affordable masterpieces - Logo Design, Graphic Design, Web Site Design, Branding and Marketing Agency - Sydney, Melbourne, Perth, Brisbane, Gold Coast Australia 
"Super-humans", lol
If you read the article they make it clear that the numbers are within the margin of error, thus it is a statistical tie. However, give it no more than three weeks, and I predict he will then be firmly in the lead.  People keep calling him the anti-hillary.  It's much more than that though.  He's the most intelligent, well qualified person to lead this country right now.  We can't afford to just have another politician in office.  We need someone who will win back the respect of the world, and he's the only person who I can see doing that.
perhaps that admission disqualifies me as too weak to have choice or summat. Cummon, Muslim women are women too, and if you would stop marginalising them from both ends - like too dumb to resist that beating Husband's command to veil against their will and not your projection, cos damnit, they are weak...] can you begin to see the flaw? if Muslim women want to enjot 'liberation' and freedom and participation in western societies, then they must first submit to your rules about how they should dress etc... Or they should go back to where they came from, which is an arrant racist attitude, since Islam has the fastest conversion rate of any religion in the west. If you are going to make a fight of this.. at least keep to one set of rules please... *edit to sound less psycho and try to make more sense.. a short retarection towards that aim.
How do they know it was molten steel? Aluminum melts at 660C, well within the possible range of temperatures of a jet fuel fire. http://www.tms.org/pubs/journals/JOM/0112/Eagar/Eagar-0112.html The fire is the most misunderstood part of the WTC collapse. Even today, the media report (and many scientists believe) that the steel melted. It is argued that the jet fuel burns very hot, especially with so much fuel present. This is not true. Part of the problem is that people (including engineers) often confuse temperature and heat. While they are related, they are not the same. Thermodynamically, the heat contained in a material is related to the temperature through the heat capacity and the density (or mass). Temperature is defined as an intensive property, meaning that it does not vary with the quantity of material, while the heat is an extensive property, which does vary with the amount of material. One way to distinguish the two is to note that if a second log is added to the fireplace, the temperature does not double; it stays roughly the same, but the size of the fire or the length of time the fire burns, or a combination of the two, doubles. Thus, the fact that there were 90,000 L of jet fuel on a few floors of the WTC does not mean that this was an unusually hot fire. The temperature of the fire at the WTC was not unusual, and it was most definitely not capable of melting steel.    http://www.du.edu/~jcalvert/tech/failure.htm The World Trade Center towers used neither a steel skeleton nor reinforced concrete. They were designed as square tubes made of heavy, hollow welded sections, braced against buckling by the building floors. Massive foundations descended to bedrock, since the towers had to be safe against winds and other lateral forces tending to overturn them. All this was taken into consideration in the design and construction, which seems to have been first-rate. An attempt to damage the buildings by a bomb at the base had negligible effect. The strong base and foundation would repel any such assault with ease, as it indeed did. The impact of aircraft on the upper stories had only a local effect, and did not impair the integrity of the buildings, which remained solid. The fires caused weakening of the steel, and some of the floors suddenly received a load for which they were not designed. What happened next was unexpected and catastrophic. The slumped floors pushed the steel modules outwards, separating them from the floor beams. The next floor then collapsed on the one below, pushing out the steel walls, and this continued, in the same way that a house of cards collapses. The debris of concrete facing and steel modules fell in shower while the main structure collapsed at almost the same rate. In 15 seconds or so, 110 stories were reduced to a pile 9 stories high, mainly of steel wall modules and whatever was around them. The south tower collapsed 47 minutes after impact, the north tower 1 hour 44 minutes after impact. The elapsed times show that the impacts were not the proximate cause of collapse; the strong building easily withstood them. When even one corner of a floor was weakened and fell, the collapse would soon propagate around the circumference, and the building would be lost. It is clear that buildings built in this manner have a catastrophic mode of failure ("house of cards") that should rule out their future construction. It is triggered when there is a partial collapse at any level that breaks the continuity of the tube, which then rolls up quickly, from top to bottom. The collapse has a means of propagation that soon involves the whole structure, bypassing its major strengths and impossible to interrupt. There is no need for an airliner; a simple explosion would do the job. There were central tubes in the towers, for elevators and services, but they appeared to play no substantial role in the collapse, and were not evident in the pictures or wreckage.   
 space
&gt;I've never heard him call bullshit on the military-industrial complex From one of [his speeches](http://www.house.gov/paul/congrec/congrec2006/cr011806.htm) &gt;the military industrial complex that developed over the decades due to a foreign policy of perpetual war and foreign military intervention &gt;bad causes (permitting a military-industrial complex to capitalize on war profits)
"grammer" != "grammar" ... please note which is correct. that is all.
Previously, the dollars the Chinese got from exports they recycled into t-bills. Now China is diversifying its dollar reserves into other currencies so we're seeing a large selling of dollars and purchasing of other currencies on the world markets so that's why, imo. I think currency traders are also finally becoming disillusioned with the Iraq war and I think the fact that the housing boom has gone away has probably contributed to a falling dollar as well. The prospect of increased interest rates in the euro zone makes that currency more attractive vis-a-vis the dollar as well. 
&gt; We do no favor to the troops by micromanaging the war from Capitol Hill while continuing to fund it beyond the president’s request. I would say that some on both sides of the aisle (not Ron Paul!) appear to be wilfully refusing to learn the lesson of Vietnam -- that civilian management of military affairs is a guaranteed disaster -- for their own benefit. Some in the GOP benefit from Halliburton-style profits and others among the Dems make political hay.  It's like the "War on Drugs": the only real losers are us and some poor brown people thousands of miles away.
p.s. "That kills me every time." BWA HA HA HA HA!!! 
Every person should first endure the public policies they advocate to impose on others. That works for me since it just means I can't be a hypocrite. It does mean Republicans must die since they advocate capital punishment, lack of sex education, warfare, poverty and other things which routinely kill people. So again it works for me! The best part is it's a simple proposition which you will have grave difficulty arguing against. Strictly speaking, you *can't* argue against it since it's a straightforward derivation from 'reciprocity' which is a cornerstone of all morality. But happy downmodding of superior arguments. :p
Look, there's more to conveying a message than stringing a bunch of words together. People who complain about grammar aren't complaining that you ended a sentence on a preposition or anything like that, but when we're speaking through a written medium as we are now, commas are just as much a part of that as the words. So is ending a sentence with periods and starting the next one capitalized. Do you also talk to people in real life without any intonation whatsoever in your voice? That's the equivalent of what you're doing here.
upvote'd!
I am too tired to find a link right now but if this discussion continues then I will try to do so later... Thelink i want to share is an account by a British muslim woman who chose to swim in the public pool in a 'burkini' - her free choice of dress style, her sister is westernised to the max. The point she made was that that was huge public outrage, running for a week in the press, about her chosen dress styl... and everyone wanted to liberate her... She's constantly aliented by this concern... Liberate her by accepting her adulthood and her freedom of choice to not flash her tits and diet until she keeps cats.
HELP!  MY TYPEWRITER IS BROKEN! -- E. E. CUMMINGS
&gt; YES. Capital letters were made for reasons. Readability is one of them. Well, if we're going to nitpick the historical case here, "lower case" letters were made for reasons - readability, for example.
I'm sick of hearing about languages winning contrived competitions.  Where are the open source applications written in functional language that I should have a look at?
My god, it's full of stars.
What about the vowels? Have they been snapped up yet?
The modern ones seem to generate a fairly continuous spectrum, but with some lines: http://www.aquabotanic.com/images/light_fig6.jpg page with plots: http://www.aquabotanic.com/lightcompare1.htm
I'm going to be snarky and infer that based on this comment's vote tally, reddit's demographic skews ugly.
&gt;dentures He should call them something else, Call them ornamental gum coverings or something. There's a similar thing with "hearing aids".  To be called a "hearing aid" it has to go through a doctor. Without the doctor you have to call it something else, listening device etc., even if it works just as well. 
let her swin 3 lengths of a public pool without a public debate that demands she show more skin.
actually what i'm doing in this thread is making a mistake... i should've known better than to post comments in a thread as uptight and / or anal as a thread about proper grammar. i up-voted you though. i mostly agree with you, you just said it better than i did / can.
Ah, but that's not true.  They just recently just discovered that plant methane outdoes human generated methane by orders of magnitude.  The scientific community was shocked.  http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/sci/tech/4604332.stm  The point is that they had these supposedly "perfect" models that "proved" beyond question that man made global warming was destroying the planet.  Then someone drops a bombshell on their foundation, showing that their proof was a fraud and their computer models instantly lost all credability.  Al Gore and his camp have been in attack mode ever since. 
Hmm, good points. I guess the technology just is there yet. I'll file this one next to my robot that worries for people. (Incidentally, it's pretty good. If you have something you need to worry about, it will grind its gears and make stomach acid for you while moving back and forth ineffectively. So far I haven't gotten any buyers though.)
Two points:  a) In most real-world problems, there are more than two possible answers. The real opposite of a position is a much smaller set of positions then just the negation of a position. For example, the opposite of die-hard libertarianism is die-hard communism, but no one believes that those two positions are the only possible positions, or that if die-hard libertarianism is wrong, then die-hard communism must a priori be right. b) The support of an idea by the herd may be vacuous, but it is not necessarily entirely circular. An idea may get a following by sheer chance, but it may also gain a following because a kernel of intelligent people believe in it and people latched onto them. It may also gain a following because everyone who didn't believe in it died from such causes as starvation.
Template metaprogramming. Runner up: XSLT.
The author of the study is right.  Maybe as mayor of NYC, Giuliani's head's so far up his ass he can't see the forest for the trees.  Hillary seems in the same boat.   But the American people as a whole are beginning to realize that absolute safety from terrorist attacks is neither necessary nor desirable.   If, as a result of not being a nation of rabid paranoid schizophrenics, a few soccer moms get their SUVs blown up by IEDs along with them and the entire team, that's just the price a free society pays for freedom.
Ooh, nice Donald Rumsfeld reference...&lt;/sarcasm&gt;
THANKS 
I couldn't live without darcs...
温めなおすのに、蒸し器使う人が多いですね。  時間かかかんないのかな？優雅ですね。（イメージですが） 「チンしたものは被爆したもの」と知人が言っていた、という人がいました。本人は「さすがにそこまでは」といった感じでしたが。ぎゃ!!!
Here, take this.  *passes tinfoil hat*
Hey!  Can I be a Culture Terrorist, too? At first, I felt faintly ill reading this, but once I got to: "'The world,' he tells her, is a forty-five-year-old pervert posing as another tween online."  I stopped being able to take it seriously enough to feel ill any more. I don't know if that's a good thing.  These people scare me, and I don't think just laughing them off is going to keep them from gaining power and the hearts and minds of innocents through scare tactics.
Um... you spend hours on reddit.com, and you're complaining about inefficiencies?
&gt; the reading ability of a person of at least average intelligence isn't slowed down by the usage of only lowercase letters and the occasional imperfect usage of punctuation. Wrong.
Interesting issue on what employers will need to expect from future employees.
We're talking about what the neocons *believed,* Like Bush himself, they thought the war (and the ensuing wave of democracy) would be such a success that the whole free world would come over to our side, even if they hadn't supported the war. Obviously, that didn't exactly come to pass, to say the least. But it was a war -- crusade --  driven, and sustained, mostly by ideology.  Actually, I suspect that if it hadn't been driven so much by ideology -- and blind faith -- and instead been driven primarily by $$ it probably would have gone better, in that a less-ideological White House would have actually paid attention to those people in the CIA and the military who actually knew something about Iraq.
Hilarious.
old
It doesn't apply to you, so feel free to criticise it all you want. But don't advocate free speech and then tell someone they are wrong for excercising it.
I would say that while your responses are entirely intelligible, my first response at seeing a post that doesn't start with a capital letter is to assume that since the writer has abandoned one of the prime rules of punctuation within the language, he will just as easily fall prey to other common grammatical errors.  Maybe I'm stereotyping here, but it seems to be a rule that holds true more often than not. Also, while it may be true that "a person of at least average intelligence" (whatever that is) will be able to easily read your message, I don't believe that it is true that we won't be slowed down.  Typography is something that has been polished across generations - I think it stands to reason that there are good reasons to include lower case letters.  ( Though, I suppose that it's possible that there's not, and it's merely [tradition](http://www.lyricskeeper.com/fiddler_on_the_roof_soundtrack-lyrics/76197-tradition-lyrics.htm). )
see volcanic ash shards from Mt Erebus [here](http://geoinfo.nmt.edu/labs/microprobe/images/bit161-big.jpg"shard") and a bit about it's [ice towers, ice caves and lava bombs](http://www.smithsonianmagazine.com/issues/2006/december/antarctica.php"ice &amp; lava")
That's a shirt with the code badly enhanced using Adobe® Photoshop® software.
Anyone else find it interesting how people have divided themselves between 'new' and 'elder' (R|r)edditors? I wonder at what point you graduate...
breathtaking, unique, modern, fantastic...... Dubai Marina.... space for more than 100 000 inhabitants, more than 120 Mega Tower, complete infrastructure of a own city..... Living on the beachfront for all nationalities and cultures...
no investment, jobs, home based
Yes, that's right. I would guess that the notion that these numbers are copyrighted is the result of a misunderstanding somewhere.
Tangerine Trees Business Consultancy, the refreshingly straightforward business advisers, has just announced on its website the launch of a new service to put an end to small businesses missing out on valuable advice.
We'd also appreciate it if you would not append exclamation points.
"The other car, smaller than an SUV but bigger than a Pinto..." A Pinto?  That's the best size comparison he could come up with - a car that hasn't been manufactured for over 25 years.  Talk about an obsolete automotive (cultural?) reference!
You should get your sarcasm detector recalibrated.
via http://enbug.tdiary.net/20070430.html#p02
infopreneur, infopreneuring, info-preneur, Internet, information product, infoproduct, information marketing, information entrepreneur
&gt; a few Jews have done more for humanity than all the Muslims of the last centuries for example Wow. You've really gone off the deep end there. Just to give you some perspective, 3 of the last 4 [Nobel Peace Prize](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nobel_Peace_Prize) recipients were Muslim.
I wonder what costumes they were wearing when they burst into his home?
Low CPC.
&gt; Some people boycott unethical companies. All companies are, to some extent, unethical. The goal of starting a company is to make money, not to knit sweaters for orphaned puppies, unless one can turn a healthy profit doing so. I have no problem supporting and using Microsoft tools. I don't actually like using Windows as a desktop; my primary machine is a Mac. But that's personal preference. I used to be a Linux fanboy/MS hater zealot a decade ago. I don't care about juvenile, petty stuff like that anymore.
But not everyone can afford legal copies of PS. Going GIMP is way better than bootleg copies of PS.
You might want to [research scientology](http://xenu.net/) a bit more. There's actually quite a [hefty relation](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Xenu) between his scifi writing and his very profitable cult.
I think it's the opposite. I am sure, and there's no doubt in my mind for as long as I've had a breath on this Earth, that we're coming to an age, a period where all humans can drive their decisions on this issue, that we can do it together. For I have seen the answer, and while it might be hard for your brother, even if you accept the truth and embrace your beliefs, trying to work together with others, to imagine an world where there's absolutely no doubt about what Artificial Intellingence can cause to us, you'll also see. Because the future is here, it is right now.
Here I was kicking back and thoroughly enjoying the flagellation of equine carcases and you come and spoil the fun. 
This is beyond messed up on so many levels. FTA: "Recently, this case was heard in the Nanhai (Foshan) court and the three defendants were found guilty and sentenced to 6 months each in prison." This is the judge: "In Liu Jingjing's view, the defendants were decent people who were ignorant." Amazing, simply amazing.
Perl. I'm a masochist.
The reason that I know about Al Jazeera was the western media screaming in outrage at them so I thought I would have a look. I don't recall any sales pitches in their favour. If they sought me out it was through reverse psychology on the part of right wing news organisations. My experience of AJ is that the English language website seems broadly similar in tone and balance to the BBC but with an arabic slant. A useful source but with some seriously rubbish cartoonists. I read it occasionally but often enough to know that the slagging it takes is mostly unjustified. But then once or twice I read Pravda during the Cold War. Am I being manipulated? Usually, by someone or other. Just add salt in small doses.
I don't have a syndrome.  http://www.commondreams.org/headlines04/0923-02.htm  Paragraph 4.  The story says it could be the French, or the Italians (Burlusconi was pro-Bush), they could never get to the bottom of it, the only direct sources told conflicting stories (further burying the truth). So, how do you know what you know?  I believe that you believe it. 
&gt; A. They assert that higher muscle mass does not increase one's BMI, which is patently false. They didn't say that. They said (in so many words) that, while some people are classified as 'overweight' because of muscle mass or build, they didn't think more lesbians than heterosexual girls (proportionately) would are classified as overweight this reason, i.e. muscle does not explain the higher odds of being overweight. They also said people are rarely obese due to high muscle mass, and that sounds plausible: Obese means BMI&gt;30, 20% above the top of the 'normal' scale. While there are people who are well built or muscular and thus fall into the 'overweight' category, there are not very many who have that much and then another 20% (of their body weight) more.
Chamberpot immigration.
Keep livin' the dream friend.
What powers does the state have to enforce a tax liens on your property
I do agree that they were trying to remake the Middle East.  Interestingly the current map was designed in large part by Winston Churchill after WWI.  Back then the idea was to build in factions so that countries are continually in crisis.   Who could foresee a world where global commerce makes markets and hence market prices subject to local disruptions?
OK I will user poper grammer. U guys rok!
In mormonism you have [Kolob](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kolob), the planet where god lives. Joseph Smith learned this from reading scrolls that were part of a traveling mummy exhibit. Not kidding. And apart from being generally nutty, it's a pretty scary bunch when you learn more about the cult. http://www.exmormon.org/
Another government give away to large corporations at the expense of the less wealthy.
Many companies have always had their products open-source so that their clients and customers could debug through and audit the code.  Going open-source doesn't imply that the company is giving up rights to the code, thats what free software is. On the OSI history page it clearly states their intention to re-brand 'free software' as 'open source' as a public relations tactic.
Print some t-shirts with these hex numbers on them, sell until you rich.  Then chill out cause everyone you know is dead.
Bad debunking. Says it'll go from 1-8 and talks about 12th? I agree with the article author, but I too would be afraid to offer this piece as anything but something I've downmodded at reddit, while laughing.
Oh, I see, a _fictional_ columnist.
I was thinking the same thing. This job seems like something a machine could do. Possibly not faster than her, but it could keep up the speed 24/7.
White males aren't allowed to speak out against this type of thing without substantial backlash and being labeled bigots etc etc. I've been through so much diversity training etc and 95% of it seems to indirectly guilt/bash white males (albeit its either men, or whites, or middle/upper class).
Former porn webmaster reveals affiliate marketing secrets.
This journal is very prestigious.
Ugh, the OBO, what a worthless rag. I didn't know until my third semester here that it wasn't an Onion knock-off. I especially liked the auction they had at the beginning of last year that they first advertised as "a gun auction for women and gay men: a gun in every purse".
Funny photo
Indeed, it's the most shocking fictional murder of 2007 not to involve Parepin.
One of these days I'm going to find you Reddit assholes and beat you down too.
You can't be serious, can you? Do I really need to put quotes around it for you to get it? It's funny because they misspell it.
Have there been any significant changes since then? And, haha, you kill me.
&gt;Given that Haskell appears to be very popular Come again?
I'm one of the editors for my university's literary magazine.  We had about 70 poetry submissions this year from a very diverse audience (diverse in level of writing ability, that is).  I noticed a distinct trend in the submissions: the worse the talent of the poet, the more likely he or she was to write in all lowercase letters, ignore punctuation, etc. Scott McCloud has an interesting theory about the creation of art and the imitation of art (which he describes in Understanding Comics).  I'll oversimplify it here by saying that while some individuals are able to understand the rules of a medium and use them to the best advantage, others see the surface-level product of another's talent and try to recreate something that looks like the final product without understanding the process that is essential in the creation of that product.
Python, everything just comes so easy, I didn't even know the language when I started using it for scripting tasks.
I wonder if that includes supplemental appropriations or not.
..but not *this specific book*. He doesn't state L. Ron as a favourite author, just Battlefield Earth. Is there any pro-scientology shit in that? I can't remember any.
u r a h8r!
Sin?  Virtue? For a Reddit-reader, you're pretty stuck on medieval superstition.   Please move forward.
"plausible undeniably".  I like that.  What does it mean?
lol
can i see some of your poetry?
&gt;A shrill scream pierces the afternoon air. Gingerly, I prise my sweaty hands away from my eyes to find all of my dinner companions staring at me in shock. It's then that I realise the noise is coming from me. Was anybody else surprised that this was written by a woman? I didn't think so.
False dilemma, anyone? With the appropriate setup, it should cost much less to (quickly) shovel up an overpass suicide than it would cost to prevent that person from doing it. Do we really need to encourage these unstable people to stick around?
A lot of users on reddit (me included) indicate they like it, although I imagine in a highbrow kind of way. I seriously cannot imagine writing an application in it though.
Well, seems like an asinine "revelation" by mr Spolsky's, or is he seriously saying just because the current (suboptimal) method of elevator interaction is tradition, better alternatives should be shunned? So much for progression in usability then. It's not a bug, it's a deviation from the norm. The 90% recurring users who will be using the elevator, workers, will learn the new system in - oh i dunno - 30s, and be much happier for it. With that mentality, we'd still have rotary dial phones, not use zippers and use wheels to steer our cars - oh, wait ...
Darcs is cool (I say while listening to music on hmp3, running under xmonad).
How to make money using video
My wife is a nurse and it would seem they are the compassionate ones.
  Cellulite pills (such as Cellesene, CellaLean, CellaLose) have NEVER been proven in a certifiable clinical study to affect any cellulite cases. In fact some companies have been ordered to pay penalties and refunds as well.  People continue to buy them and continue to be defrauded.  Even if you were to take a stimulant (which are dangerous by the way) and your heart would race and your body burn more calories because of the caffeine, ephedra, ma huang, etc. - you lose weight all over not in one areas.  Although the caffeine is a diuretic and will cause you to lose water, dehydrating you, making your cellulite look worse if you don't drink enough to replenish what you sweat and pee out.   I can't recommend them.
Could you explain the relevance of this reference? While I am on the subject. If Jesus was half Mary, half gods DNA his y chromosome must have been only from God. This means there must be a perfect Y chromosome. Which is a bit odd.
two*
I'm sure most proponents of capital punishment would be happy to have their policies applied to them - they would be sentenced to capital punishment IF THEY COMMITTED A CRIME WARRANTING IT. You might be the dumbest person on here. 
Common Lisp. Thinking in it is natural for me, it's fast to read, write, and run, and there is ample documentation and lots of libraries.
Again (see above): You really ARE the dumbest person on here.
I want to see someone take action against people who offer the left-handed only scholarships. That's discrimination against righties!
Python.
The interesting part is that you have a presidential candidate, supposedly and intelligent and well-read person , who claims that "Battle Field Earth" is his favorite book. The book is literary garbage by any standard. And on top of that, there's the obvious scientology connection, which no matter what you say cannot be ignored. Mr Hubbard wrote books to get people to join his big scam and give him all their money - not to sell $7.50 paperbacks.
Actually I was concentrating on it's not being staged
Um, no. Spelling is a separate part of language. Capitalization, depending on context, is *either* modified by grammar *or* by spelling.
False - see the [facebook link](http://ucr.facebook.com/group.php?gid=2373716526&amp;ref=nf)
Python, for the fun of programming with it, for its expressiveness and its extensive community supported libraries that really helps you get anything done quickly. OCaml, for the beauty of it and the speed of generated code. Programming in OCaml makes you feel able to touch the platonic world of pure and perfect concepts. That's probably a consequence of the type inference system. It's just a shame that OCaml is not (yet?) as community driven as python and as a consequence cannot come close to it in terms of library completeness.  Now working with Java 5 as a day job. Not that bad but not as fun and expressive as python. Might have a look at haskell some day.
Python, because I can be extremely lazy with it.  I'm only an amateur programmer and python allowed me to create stuff with minimum learning and effort.  My programming does not involve "smallest size", or "fastest execution" but it does involve "create this GUI thingy that should do this and that" where "this and that" ranges from visual manipulation of some visual concept (breast shapes) to accessing a photo database. Network communication was "we should add that too" and python allowed me to do it. I'm sure there are other languages that can do all this too but python was here first for me and I'm now in a point where I'd rather quit my job that return to Java or C.
Because stuff goes by too quickly on the new page?
Because we find nerdly subjects interesting?
My IQ is 0x4951.
Maybe if we did away with patents entirely we would start to see some real innovation again.  Instead, whenever someone comes up with a great new idea no-one is able to improve on it because it is patented.  I've always found it ridiculous that although our system is supposed to be a free economy the entire system relies on patents and copyrights rather than the ability of an individual or company to produce the best product.
Pet Supply Store – Buy pet products for all of your pet’s needs.  Dog beds, dog  crates, dog clothes and toys, cat beds, cat condos, fish supplies, bird supplies, hamster  and other small pet supplies. 
Just remember these courts have **no legal powers**: If a court orders a fine which you do not pay, there is absolutely nothing the court or the 'victim' can do about it in the legal sense. If the 'victim' takes the fine from you, that is still theft. If the court orders a beating, and you get beaten, that is still assault. What is worrying is that British law could end up being undermined if the muslim community enforces Sharia law amoungst its own members: In the best case someone who steps out of line (ignores an order or a fine) will get ostracised but dissident muslims have in the past had their property vandalised, been assaulted, kidnapped and even murdered - all in the UK. And if a community becomes sufficiently closed off it becomes extremely difficult for the police to do anything about it because witnesses could also be 'discouraged' from coming forward. In other words this isn't lefty political correcties pandering to other religions - it is a closed community applying its own laws and subverting (within its own community) the rule of UK law.
Python and C++ for writing Python extensions.
Makes sense, that explains why U.S. - a nation of composed entirely of immigrants -- has so many shooting deaths every year.
lets not forget John Fogerty being sued by his former record company for sounding like *gasp* - John Fogerty!
i just put it up on the uni whiteboard. in big red letters... i also doodled a smiley face
Think of the likes of say Richard Dalkins talking about faith as a disease that should be banned. This is the kind of thing that gets people to react if you get my meaning.   It's actually got nothing to do with your leaders since leading liberals seems to be like herding cats.
Writability, actually (even though readability was not far behind). http://www.bellevuelinux.org/lower_case.html
YAY!! But you know she will come out swinging, I get the impression she will do anything to win.
AAAAAAGGHGGHHHHHHHH!!!!!!!!
I have read one L. Ron Hubbard book in my life - The Invaders Plan. It was so very very very bad I immediately read it again straight afterwards to make sure it was as bad as I thought. The worst part was that I read all the way to the end, before finding out that it was the first book in a series of ten (!!!). The fact that there were another nine books as awful as that one blew my mind.
Actually plenty of bugs occur from coding issues in my code, and I imagine I am not unique in this respect.
Organic food doesn't have more nutrients.  The benefit is it has less synthetic chemicals, such as pesticides and fertilizers. http://www.consumersunion.org/food/organicsumm.htm
Hubris.  He's just short and caught, looking to offload.
Documents captured in recent fighting in Baghdad included two identity cards for access to the fortified Green Zone, which contains Iraqi government headquarters, and an ID card for access to the U.S. Embassy, the Pentagon says."
How does buying credits help the environment? If everyone is just buying credits and no one is actually cutting down(which is what's happening) then the idea is useless. I'm highlighting how useless carbon credits are.  So instead just donate the money to the damn poor.
&gt; I seriously cannot imagine writing an application in it though. Interesting. Why is that you think? Just lack of experience with FP methods?
I support the 10mm Pea Gravel for President!
&gt;Where does your world end? Watford Gap.
You think you think, but do you really?
4 8 15 16 23 42
A better way to phrase it (I also thought of this when I saw the title) would be to say that slow motion *is* high FPS. The High FPS is redundant, not the Slow motion.
Good review for beginners in digital photography
&gt; but from a customer requirement not understood or a spec that is incomplete,   &gt; platform issues or some other edge case only tangentially related to code. I think these are not so much bugs as *flaws*.  In these cases the programs could be working correctly, it is just not working as desired.  I think of bugs more like "why the hell does this pointer keep getting set to null?",  "why is the application suddenly not responding?" and "why am I getting notified twice when this property changes (causing the list to be destroyed and rebuilt again) ?".
Google "people that predicted iraq" and you find this MetaFilter link answering the question:  http://ask.metafilter.com/59119/Anyone-who-predicted-failures-of-Iraq-war-and-why
Just out of interest, which current culture is closest to the mono-culture you're proposing? Or which parts of which cultures would you combine to get to this ideal mono-culture? Reading your replies, I couldn't help thinking of this joke *Heaven is a place where the police are English; the chefs are Italian; the car mechanics are German; the lovers are French and it's all organized by the Swiss.* *Hell is a place where the police are German; the chefs are English; the car mechanics are French; the lovers are Swiss and it's all organized by the Italians.*
sounds like an emergency case.
Hello, Old redditors! New redditors appriciate if you point them useful resources.
Its amazing what the human body can do when its been conditioned as well as the bodies of those men have. But wrestling a cow isn't really that hard.  He should have wrestled a bull, or at the least a horned steer.
Tough two choices.  #1 is about playing God.  #2 is as fundamental as Greek mythology.
As I understand the matter it is accepted practice these days to start a sentence with a conjunction. And one can even start a sentence with 'and'. I'll live with the fragmentation if even one person on the Internet starts saying too instead of to when it is appropriate. Oh, and don't get me started on the there vs their debate.
Normal copyright applies:  they would have to obtain permission from the author to distribute his work. In other words, you can use any data (and hence any copyrighted work) as a key, but you cannot claim copyright on just any data.
Not to mention the facts that 1) the support beams are STILL STANDING and did not melt or suffer much damage at all.  The only parts that melted were the exposed steel joints that attached the freeway to the columns.  2) The lower freeway did NOT COLLAPSE.  There was no pancaking of lower levels.   It is fine to compare the two as long as differences are given their due.  Afterall, this situation actually helps to deny the jet fuel theory of the WTC collapse if you take into consideration all the facts.
